CIK: 1512138
Company Name: GREAT BASIN SCIENTIFIC INC 
Form Type : 10-K
Filing Date: 2017-03-22
Accession Number: 0001564590-17-004956


ITEM 1 BUSINESS. Overview We are a molecular diagnostic testing company focused on the development and commercialization of our patented, molecular diagnostic platform designed to test for infectious disease, especially hospital acquired infections. We believe that laboratories in small to medium sized hospitals, those under 400 beds, are in need of simpler and more affordable molecular diagnostic testing methods. We market a system that combines both affordability and ease of use, when compared to other commercially available molecular testing methods, which we believe will accelerate the adoption of molecular testing in small to medium sized hospitals. Our system includes an analyzer, which we provide for our customers use without charge in the United States, and a diagnostic cartridge, which we sell to our customers. For purposes of this report, we use the term assay(s) to describe our existing diagnostic test product as well as our diagnostic test products under development. Our testing platform has the capability to identify up to 64 individual targets at 1 time. If the assay identifies 1 to 3 targets, we refer to them as low plex tests, or tests, and if they identify four or more targets we refer to them as multi plex panels, or panels. We currently have four commercially available tests, our first for clostridium difficile, or C. diff , which received clearance from the United States Food and Drug Administration, or FDA, in April 2012, our second for Group B Strep, which received clearance from the FDA in April 2015 and launched commercially in June 2015, our third for Shiga Toxin Direct, or STEC, which received clearance from the FDA in March 2016 and launched commercially in August 2016 and the fourth Staphylococcus Identification and Resistance Blood Culture Panel, or Staph ID R panel, which received FDA clearance in March 2016 and launched commercially in September 2016. Our customers consist of hospitals, clinics, laboratories and other healthcare providers in the United States, the European Union and New Zealand. Molecular diagnostic testing generally reduces test time from days to hours compared to culture methods, and typically provides much more accurate results than non molecular rapid assays. Culture testing utilizes a sample taken from a patient, which is incubated in a culture medium; the operator waits for the microorganisms, if there are any, to grow until they are in large enough quantities to be detected. This method can take days and in some cases requires highly trained laboratory technicians to perform the tests and interpret the results. The accuracy of culture based methods has been shown to be lower than that of molecular based approaches. For example, in a multi arm, multicenter clinical study using our C. diff test, we increased detection sensitivity nearly 20% as compared to the culture based arm. Molecular testing methods, like our system, utilize technologies to multiply the DNA from a small sample until it can be detected by an automated, visual system. A key difference between our system and other molecular systems is our use of a low cost, but highly sensitive, semiconductor chip based detection system. This allows us to utilize existing comp1nts, for example digital camera comp1nts, to provide visual evidence of the result. This provides more accurate answers generally in hours and can be operated by technicians with less extensive training than is required for culture testing. We believe these advantages can lead to shortened hospital stays and improved patient outcomes, resulting in reduced costs for hospitals that implement molecular testing in their labs. We believe this improvement in the time to result and the quality of those results has led to a fast growing market for molecular diagnostic systems at hospitals. We believe our system is well positi1d to meet this need and attract new customers. As of December 31, 2016, we had 265 customers worldwide (244 in the United States and 21 in the rest of the world), who use an aggregate of 498 of our analyzers. For additional information about our products, see Our Assay Menu below. Our operations to date have been funded primarily through sales of capital stock, convertible notes, sale leaseback transactions and cash from operations. We expect to continue developing additional diagnostic tests and conducting clinical trials over the next several years. In addition, while we expect our sales and marketing expenses will increase proportionately as we introduce the new tests, we believe commission expenses will decline as a percentage of revenue. 3 Our Strategy Our goal is to become the leading provider of sample to result, multiplex and low plex molecular diagnostic testing in infectious disease by leveraging the strengths of our affordable diagnostic testing platform. We intend to expand the use of our platform by targeting small to medium sized hospitals in the United States with fewer than 400 beds. We believe that our low cost platform will be attractive to these hospitals in particular, which may not otherwise have sufficient resources to justify the purchase of a molecular diagnostic sample to result solution. To achieve this objective, we intend to do the following Leverage our Low Cost Platform to Quickly Penetrate the Small and Medium Sized Hospital Market. We provide our customers with our analyzer at no cost and sell them the disposable, single use diagnostic cartridges. This allows us to avoid the long sales cycle inherent in selling capital equipment and expand into hospitals that previously could not afford to implement a molecular diagnostic platform. Accelerate the Growth of our U.S. Customer Base. We intend to expand our sales force to target small to medium hospitals in the United States. We anticipate that increasing our number of customers will drive sales of our diagnostic cartridges. We expect these sales will generate the majority of our revenue for the foreseeable future. Expand our Menu of Molecular Diagnostic Assays. We intend to expand our assay menu to include additional assays for our platform that we believe will satisfy growing medical needs and present attractive commercial opportunities. For example, in 2014 we completed the clinical trials and filed the 510(k) application for our second test for Group B Strep, and in April 2015 we received FDA clearance for our Group B Strep test. In March 2016 we also received clearance for Staph ID R and for Shiga toxin producing E. coli. In December 2016, we submitted a 510(k) application for our Stool Bacteria Pathogenic Panel (food borne illness) to the FDA, and in January 2017, we submitted a 510(k) application to the FDA for our Bordatella Pertussis (whooping cough) test. We also have a pipeline of assays in late stage product development, including a test for Chlamydia Gonorrhea, a pre surgical screening test, and a panel for Candida blood infections. Reduce our Cost of Sales through Automation and Volume Purchasing. We manufacture our proprietary diagnostic cartridges and analyzers at our manufacturing facility in Salt Lake City, Utah. We currently hand build our diagnostic cartridges and purchase materials at a higher per unit cost due to low purchase volumes. We believe that investment in automation of portions of the manufacturing and assembly process and volume purchase pricing will significantly improve our gross margins and enhance our ability to provide a low cost solution to customers. The Great Basin Platform Our platform, which employs a combination of proprietary and patented technology, consists of a bench top analyzer with a touch screen (or, in early models, a laptop computer) into which our self contained, single use diagnostic cartridges are inserted. We believe that our platform is user friendly and intuitive and provides the hospital with the ability to perform molecular diagnostic assays in an efficient and cost effective manner. The Analyzer The Diagnostic Cartridge The User Placing the Diagnostic Cartridge into the Analyzer 4 Once a patient specimen is received in the lab, a technician will typically perform no more than 3 to five steps of sample preparation before placing the sample in our disposable diagnostic cartridge and inserting it in the analyzer where the assay is run without further technician intervention. Our four FDA cleared assays were rated by Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments of 1988, or CLIA, as moderately complex, which typically eliminates the need for highly trained and expensive molecular technicians to run the assays, bringing additional cost benefit to our customers. We expect our future assays to be rated moderately complex or meet CLIA waiver criteria, which is reserved for assays that are simple and are judged by the FDA to present a low risk for err1ous results. Our platform provides accurate results in 45 to 115 minutes depending on the assays. The speed of our assays allows for early diagnosis and treatment, which we believe can lead to better patient outcomes and reduced cost to the hospital. We believe that our platform and related assays offer small to medium sized hospitals the following benefits Ease of Use. Our platform is a sample to result system. Sample preparation can be completed in 3 to five steps that typically take no more than five minutes. Once the diagnostic cartridge is placed in the analyzer, the technician does not need to monitor the assay and can complete other unrelated tasks. The assay is complete in 45 to 115 minutes depending on the assay. Cost Savings. We believe that our pricing strategy makes it possible for many small to medium sized hospitals that have cost constraints to adopt molecular testing. We provide the customer the use of our analyzer for no upfront charge, while we retain ownership. We then sell our assays to the hospital at a cost that we believe is similar to or less expensive than other molecular diagnostic solutions. This reduces the up front cost for the customer, minimizes customer approval processes and accelerates adoption of our platform. Versatile Platform with the Capability to Deliver a Broad Assay Menu. We believe our platform has broad potential application across a number of areas in molecular diagnostic testing for infectious disease, including the detection of pathogens from whole blood samples. The same analyzer can be utilized for all of our planned future assays. Low cost Low plex tests. We believe our platform, including our low cost chip detection and our single use diagnostic cartridge, has a cost structure that will allow us to compete effectively in the market for low plex tests with 1 3 answers like C. diff or pre surgical and MRSA screening. We expect our low plex tests like C. diff to drive system placements as hospitals convert from traditional testing methods. Ability to Multiplex. Our platform has the technical ability to analyze up to 64 distinct targets in a single diagnostic panel, including controls. We refer to any test of more than four targets as a multi plex panel. We believe that this capability will allow hospitals to test for multiple possible causes of an individual patient symptoms in a 1 step detection process. This capability will reduce the time required for a laboratory to perform a diagnostic analysis that involves testing for multiple infectious disease pathogens. Without our platform, similar testing would require the hospital to run multiple, separate molecular or non molecular diagnostic assays. Our Molecular Testing Process In our molecular testing process, a clinician places a clinical specimen processed or unprocessed into the diagnostic cartridge (such as stool or blood), caps the cartridge and then places the diagnostic cartridge into the analyzer. The assay routine is initiated in the analyzer and starts a simple automated process. Within the instrument, mechanical valves are present to control the flow of fluid through the cartridge and to pierce the blister packs containing the required buffers, solutions and reagents to perform the selected assay. Low cost, reliable heaters are present for assay processing. Imaging occurs with a compact digital camera placed over a window in the cartridge above the chip. Proprietary software interprets the image and provides a clinical result to the laboratory. 5 The disposable diagnostic cartridge contains in blister packs or freeze dried pellets all of the reagents required to run the applicable assay. The 3 steps of a molecular assay (sample preparation, amplification, and detection) are performed in chambers present on the cartridge. All waste is collected in a chamber that is part of the diagnostic cartridge, significantly reducing the risk of lab contamination. After the assay is completed and the result is obtained, the diagnostic cartridge is disposed of with the hospital other medical waste. To simplify processing within the analyzer, fluids are moved within the diagnostic cartridge through relatively large channels by exploiting pressure differences. Proprietary features have been designed into the diagnostic cartridge to allow for bubble free fluid movement and sensor design permits accurate and precise volumetric delivery. Our Assay Menu We have received FDA clearance for four assays, C. diff , Group B Strep, Staph ID R and E. coli and a CE mark for 3 assays, C. diff, Group B Strep and STEC. We began marketing the C. diff test in Europe in the first quarter of 2012 and in the United States in the fourth quarter of 2012 We received clearance from the FDA in April 2015 for our second diagnostic test for Group B Strep and launched this test commercially in June of 2015. We received clearance from the FDA in March of 2016 for STEC and launched this test commercially in August of 2016. We also received FDA clearance for our Staph ID R trial in March of 2016 and launched this test commercially in September of 2016. We have 2 assays that have been submitted to the FDA for review, a test for pertussis and a food borne pathogen panel. Additionally, we have 3 other assays in various stages of product development (i) a pre surgical nasal screen for Staphylococcus aureus, or SA, (ii) a panel for candida blood infections and, (iii) a test for CT NG. Our Commercial Tests C. diff Test C. diff infections are often life threatening and can create a significant financial burden for hospitals. As a hospital acquired infection, costs associated with the care of patients with C. diff are not covered by insurance or Medicaid Medicare. An independent peer reviewed paper, published in the American Journal of Infection Control in 2012, highlights a significant reduction in C. diff infection rates when a hospital switched from culture to molecular testing reducing cost and improving patient outcomes. Our C. diff test is a rapid medical diagnostic test for the detection of C. diff , a gram positive bacteria that causes severe diarrhea and other intestinal disorders. The test detects the presence of the C. diff toxin B gene, or tcdB gene, in the pathogenicity locus, or PaLOC region of C. diff , present in all known toxigenic strains, to diagnose the toxin in a patient stool. The test requires minimal sample preparation and can deliver results in 90 minutes. A swab from loose stool is placed into transfer solution and a portion of this solution is placed into the diagnostic cartridge. The diagnostic cartridge is then placed into the analyzer. Group B Strep Test Group B streptococcus , or Group B Strep, is a bacterium that colonizes in the warm moist areas of many humans. Harmless to healthy adults, it can be transmitted to a newborn during childbirth and is the single largest cause of meningitis in newborn infants. For this reason nearly every pregnant woman in the United States is tested for Group B Strep in the late third trimester. Historically this test was d1 by culture, but based on the recent introduction and sales of other Group B Strep molecular diagnostic tests, we believe labs are switching to molecular testing. Our Group B Strep test is designed to detect Group B Strep from an anal vaginal swab taken from a pregnant woman. Hospitals can use our test to identify Group B Strep colonization in pregnant women, who can then be treated with antibiotics to reduce the risk of transmission to the baby, reducing the risk of development of sepsis in the newborn. We received clearance from the FDA in April 2015 for our Group B Strep test and launched it commercially in June 2015. Shiga Toxin Direct (STEC) Test 6 Escherichia coli ( E. coli ) bacteria normally live in the intestines of healthy people and animals. Most varieties of E. coli are harmless or cause relatively brief diarrhea, but a few strains, such as E. coli O157H7, can cause severe abdominal cramps, bloody diarrhea and vomiting. Our STEC Test is designed to be a rapid test that identifies Shiga toxin produced by E. coli , including E. coli O157 specifically which is the most serious type of E. coli contracted from contaminated food. We received FDA clearance for our STEC test in March 2016. We launched the product commercially in August of 2016. Staphylococcus Identification and Resistance Blood Infection Panel Staphylococcus aureus is a major cause of hospital and community acquired infections and is associated with high rates of morbidity and mortality. Methicillin resistant Staphylococcus aureus , or MRSA, is a potentially life threatening infection that most frequently occurs in the hospital setting. Rapid diagnosis of Staph blood infections has been shown, in a report published in Clinical Practice in 2010, to save up to approximately $7,000 per patient and shorten the length of hospital stays by 6.2 days. Our Staph ID R panel is designed to be a multiplex panel to (i) identify species of Staphylococcus infections based on the detection of highly discriminatory and specific DNA sequences within a bacterial replication gene, (ii) detect the mecA gene, which confers drug resistance, directly from positive blood cultures and (iii) provide information on the antibiotic resistance profile of the bacteria. This test is designed to produce a result in less than 1 hour. We received FDA clearance for our Staph ID R panel in March 2016. We launched the product commercially in September of 2016. Our Assays under FDA Review Stool Bacterial Pathogenic Panel According to the Agency for Healthcare Research and Quality, there were nearly five million U.S. hospital visits in 2010 for gastrointestinal distress that suggested food borne illness. In 2010, inpatient costs attributable to patients suffering from gastrointestinal infections cost the healthcare system nearly $18 billion. 1 of the challenges faced by physicians assessing a patient with symptoms of gastrointestinal infection is determining the underlying cause. We expect that our Stool Bacterial Pathogenic panel will detect the main causes of food poisoning. If approved, we believe that hospitals will be able to use our panel to identify the causative pathogen of food poisoning and provide appropriate treatment quickly, improving patient outcomes. Additionally, the results may be used to aid public health agencies to track causes of food poisoning outbreaks. We started the clinical trial in the second quarter of 2016 and filed a 510(k) application with the FDA in December of 2016. Our Stool Bacterial Pathogenic panel is not cleared by the FDA or available for commercial sale. Bordatella Pertussis Test Bordatella Pertussis, also known as whooping cough, is a highly contagious respiratory disease caused by the bacterium Bordetella pertussis. In 2012, there were over 48,000 cases reported in the United States and over 16 million worldwide. We started the clinical trial in the second quarter of 2016 and filed a 510(k) application with the FDA in January of 2017. Our Bordatella Pertussis test is not cleared by the FDA or available for commercial sale. Our Assays in Development Staphyloccocus aureus Pre Surgical Nasal Screen Staphyloccocus aureus (SA) often colonizes the nasal passages and other warm moist areas in healthy humans. Harmless in most circumstances, the colonization represents real risk to patients undergoing surgery. In fact 7 studies have shown the relative risk of post surgical infection is up to eight and a half times greater in carriers of SA than in non carriers. We expect that our SA nasal screening test will be a rapid test for the presence of SA in the nasal passages of a pre surgical patient. If approved, we believe that hospitals will be able to use our test to identify pre surgical patients who are SA carriers and treat those patients with topical antibiotics, which has been shown in multiple peer reviewed studies to significantly reduce the risk of post surgical infection. Our SA pre surgical nasal screen test is not cleared by the FDA or available for commercial sale. Candida Blood Infections Panel According to the United States Center for Disease Control there are 46,000 Candida blood infections annually in the U.S. Candida infections, although rare, have mortality rates as high as 40% if not diagnosed quickly. Our candida panel is a multiplex panel that will be designed to identify five species of Candida directly from positive blood cultures. We expect to complete product development in the first half of 2017. Our Candida Blood Infections Panel is not cleared by the FDA or available for commercial sale. Chlamydia Gonorrhea (CT NG) Test Our test for Chlamydia tracomatis and Neisseria gonorrhoeae (CT NG) is designed to detect 2 significant sexually transmitted diseases. According to the CDC, there are over 20 million new CT infections each year in the U.S. and approximately 330,000 cases of NG. We expect to complete the pre clinical development of our CT NG test in the first half of 2017. Our CT NG test is not cleared by the FDA or available for commercial sale. Our Technology Our proprietary and patented technology is based on detection of DNA targets on a coated silicon chip with results visible to the naked eye. DNA naturally forms a double stranded structure, with each strand binding with high affinity and selectivity to a complementary strand. Our technology can detect DNA target strands of interest by attaching complementary strands of DNA to the chip surface, called capture probes, using our proprietary technology and processes. The capture probe can thereby immobilize the DNA target of interest. In order for the DNA target to be detected, it is labeled with biotin, a small molecule which can be used to create a signal in the diagnostic test. Biotin, immobilized onto the chip surface via DNA target hybridization to the DNA probe, will bind to a molecule which recognizes biotin and is conjugated to a signal generating enzyme, horseradish peroxidase, or HRP. Immobilized HRP can be reacted with a complex mixture to create a large colored product which deposits on the chip surface. This deposit causes the color of the chip surface to change. This color change is readily apparent to the naked eye as a dot in the vicinity of the DNA probe. In order to create tests with appropriate sensitivity for the given clinical indication, we can either amplify the quantity of DNA targets of interest or amplify the biotin based signal. Each of these amplification approaches also serve to label DNA target(s) of interest with biotin. Our Technology Detection of On chip Helicase Dependent Amplification (HDA) Reactions 8 Within the cartridge 3 distinct processes occur sample processing, amplification, and detection. During sample processing, the specimen is treated to remove clinical matrices such as blood or feces that may interfere with assay results and is treated to break open cells to release potential DNA targets. Next, the sample is subjected to target amplification to create billions of copies of target DNA to improve assay sensitivity and to label each target with biotin. Finally, detection is triggered by hybridization of the biotin labeled target DNA with capture probes on the chip surface. The chip is currently configured to hold as many as 64 probes, including controls, each of which can be configured to detect a different target DNA, enabling highly multiplexed testing. If signal amplification is used, a proprietary polymer is added to the detection reaction, which converts each target DNA associated biotin into 80 additional biotins to improve detection sensitivity. All waste generated from the assay is stored in a self contained waste chamber which significantly reduces contamination risk. Target Amplification. Helicase dependent amplification, or HDA, is a process that utilizes an enzyme, helicase, to unwind double stranded DNA to create 2 single strands through isothermal, or single temperature, amplification. Once this DNA is single stranded, complementary DNA primers, which are short pieces of DNA that are complementary to the DNA target, can hybridize. Through the action of an enzyme, DNA polymerase, the DNA primers grow, or extend, to create a complementary strand of the DNA target, creating double stranded DNA again. This process can be repeated and the degree of copying, or amplification, is exp1ntial, so that billions of copies can be created. HDA is a method already commercially available for detection of DNA targets, however, it is a mistake pr1 process. DNA primers can incorrectly hybridize to non target DNA at lower temperatures and be copied, creating so called primer artifacts, which leads to tests that are slow and poorly sensitive. Our patented target amplification approach, termed blocked primer mediated, helicase dependent amplification, or bpHDA, utilizes blocked primers to enhance test speed and sensitivity. Blocked primers are DNA primers that contain a block at lower temperatures, where most incorrect hybridization events occur, preventing extension of the DNA primers or copying of the DNA target. As the temperature is raised, incorrect hybridization events are not stable and fall apart, but hybridization of DNA primers to complementary DNA targets is still very strong and an enzyme, RNase H, becomes active which can remove the block in blocked primers hybridized to DNA targets only. As a result, the accuracy of the process is dramatically improved, leading to faster and more sensitive tests. In order to label the DNA target for detection, each DNA primer has a biotin molecule attached to 1 end. Our platform is also capable of performing polymerase chain reaction, or PCR, which is a widely used method of DNA amplification. Our Group B Strep test is our first commercial test to utilize PCR. Signal Amplification. Our patented signal amplification approach, which we refer to as AMPED, utilizes a bridging molecule to connect the biotin label on each DNA target to a polymer containing 80 biotins, thereby amplifying the signal up to 80 times in our diagnostic tests. The AMPED polymer works in the presence of blood, mucus, and feces typically present in clinical samples, thereby simplifying sample processing. The AMPED signal amplification process takes approximately 20 to 30 minutes and is a more rapid approach for detection of DNA targets than target DNA amplification, which typically takes 45 to 120 minutes. The patented AMPED polymer is highly water soluble and stable and displays low non specific binding properties, which are critical requirements for highly specific signal amplification approaches. Based on papers published in peer reviewed journals, we believe our AMPED detector to be among the most sensitive in the industry with a proven limit of detection of 20,000 DNA molecules. We believe this limit of detection will be more than adequate for us to develop assays focused on the nascent direct from whole blood market which we believe has the potential to be exceptionally disruptive by eliminating the need for culturing blood prior to testing. Currently patients suspected of having a blood infection (sepsis) have their blood drawn. That sample is then cultured for a day before testing, but published studies consistently show that treatment within 12 hours of symptoms has significant clinical benefit. Direct from whole blood testing has the potential to eliminate the need for culture, speeding diagnosis to under 12 hours, thus potentially improving patient morbidity and mortality. Diagnostic Cartridges. Our patent pending diagnostic cartridges are self contained devices specifically configured for a given diagnostic assay. The diagnostic cartridge is injection molded and includes features such as reaction chambers, a waste chamber, and channels to direct the movement of fluids. The diagnostic cartridge also contains a coated silicon detection chip consisting of an array of up to 64 DNA probes, including controls. Integrated into the diagnostic cartridge are lance devices for the reagent blister packs and stirring devices. Reaction chambers and fluid 9 channels are covered with a clear thermoplastic to form liquid tight features. All of the reagents necessary to perform the assay are stored within blister packs affixed to the cartridge, other than the target amplification reagents, which are stored as a freeze dried pellet. The diagnostic cartridge utilizes patent pending methods for controlling the flow of fluid and managing air to prevent bubbles. The diagnostic cartridge also contains bar coded information related to the test, including the cartridge lot number and expiration date. Analyzer. The analyzer is an on demand system controlled by an external touch screen or laptop. Each analyzer contains a module into which individual diagnostic cartridges are placed. Once a diagnostic cartridge has been loaded with a clinical specimen, the cartridge is inserted into the analyzer. The cartridge is then advanced onto a platform allowing access from above and below. The analyzer has 3 main sub platforms to execute the diagnostic test reagent flow control, thermal control, and the optical imaging platforms. To control reagent flow and delivery, valve actuators, which control fluid movements, and lance actuators, which lance blister packs, are located below the cartridge. Motors for mixing reactions and stepper motors, which serve to flatten blister packs and drive fluid into reagent channels, are located above the cartridge. Optical sensors located adjacent to the fluidic paths in the cartridge are used to determine fluidic movements. Compression valves are used to isolate regions of the cartridge for individual steps of the diagnostic assay. Multiple resistive heaters with thermocouple feedback are used to control temperature for each of the steps of the process. Once the test is complete a digital camera captures the resulting visible features. Processing and filtering techniques and multiple custom algorithms are used to determine test results, which are displayed on the touch screen or printed automatically. The touch screen controls each analyzer, provides power and analyzes and stores data. Technicians can load patient identification numbers and reagent lot codes by using the included bar code scanner or the touch screen. Advantages of Our Technology Low Cost Design. Our technology was designed to use injection molded parts and filled blister packs can be produced in high volumes at relatively low cost. Production of the coated silicon chip uses existing semi conductor processes and capital equipment. Our isothermal target amplification uses a relatively inexpensive heater which does not need to actively manage heat with coolers and fans. A low cost digital camera captures the visible results. Our proprietary DNA probe chemistry enables us to produce assays at relatively low cost. Easy to Perform On demand Testing. Our technology uses a sample to result approach. The customer loads a liquid clinical specimen into the diagnostic cartridge, closes it, inserts it into the analyzer and enters patient information to initiate each assay. The results are automatically generated with no user interpretation or intervention required. Hands on time is less than 10 minutes for our C. diff test and we expect hands on time to be generally less than 5 minutes for assays under development. Additionally, on demand testing allows the technician to test samples as they come into the laboratory. Finally, the presence of comprehensive built in controls means that the technician is not required to test external control samples to assure the quality of assay results. This allows laboratories to be more efficient with limited resources. High Performance Assay Results. Our technology is capable of highly specific and sensitive detection of nucleic acids. For target DNA from multiple pathogen types, we can routinely detect fewer than 3 organisms using our bpHDA target amplification approach and have detected the identity of as few as 100 organisms using our AMPED signal amplification approach. Because the speed of bpHDA is only limited by the speed of the enzymes, we have demonstrated the ability to detect target DNA in less than 20 minutes of amplification time. High Content Panels . Each of the 64 capture probes in our cartridge act independently to produce highly specific and sensitive detection for a given DNA target. The chip is optimized so that changes as small as a single base in DNA target sequence can be readily detected, allowing for detection of clinically meaningful mutations in DNA target samples. Our bpHDA technology is highly specific, allowing for simultaneous amplification of multiple DNA targets. The AMPED approach can be used to directly detect clinical specimens, thereby eliminating typical limitations of multiplexing. We expect the combination of highly multiplexed amplification and detection will allow for information rich, multi target panel results that allow clinicians to both rule out and rule in causes of disease. We believe this approach will lower testing costs and speed up the time to appropriate patient treatment, improving patient outcomes. 10 Ease of Development of New Assays. Early diagnostic test prototypes can be developed using our standard 96 well plates capable of processing 96 samples in a single experiment, rather than processing individual samples in the analyzer. We believe that this capability allows us to more easily develop and optimize new assays before transferring the design to the instrumented platform. Additionally, well established software tools enable us to design and develop DNA probes and primers. The flexibility of the cartridge design allows for utilization of an efficient, low cost approach for sample processing. License Agreements BioHelix. We hold non exclusive licenses to key technologies from BioHelix related to isothermal amplification of nucleic acid targets, utilizing helicase dependent amplification, or HDA. The term of this license agreement extends until the expiration of all the patents associated with the licensed patent rights, or until such time as we elect to terminate with 30 days notice. This license is limited to the fields of human diagnostic testing utilizing our solid chip surface detection and contains diligence and U.S. preference provisions. To date, these technologies have resulted in 3 issued U.S. patents, 1 issued European patent and 1 pending international patent family. In addition, these technologies may include related technologies that BioHelix may develop in the future. The BioHelix technologies are the basis of our nucleic acid amplification approach. In May of 2013, Quidel Corporation, a competitor of ours, purchased BioHelix. We pay a royalty fee for the licensing of this technology based on a percentage of our Net Sales of assays using these technologies (as defined in the license agreement). IDT . In August 2010, we entered into a license agreement with Integrated DNA Technologies, or IDT, related to the use of blocked primers in combination with HDA. The term of this license agreement extends until the expiration of all the patents associated with the licensed patent rights, or until such time as we elect to terminate with 90 days notice. The license is exclusive to the fields of amplification utilizing HDA and detection of diagnostic targets in human in vitro diagnostic testing, but is non exclusive to all oncology and human papilloma virus targets or markers. These technologies have resulted in four pending U.S. patent applications and 1 issued European patent. We pay a royalty fee for the license of this technology based on a percentage of our Net Sales of products using these technologies (as defined in the license agreement). Pursuant to the terms of these license agreements, we pay royalty fees in the aggregate equal to 14% of our worldwide Net Sales of those products that use these technologies (as defined and adjusted pursuant to the terms of the applicable license agreements). Our C. diff product is our only commercial product that uses these technologies. Our products under review by the FDA and all of our products under development do not use these technologies and will not be subject to royalty fees. Market Opportunity We believe the global market for molecular diagnostic testing is approximately $5.0 billion per year and will experience a growth rate of approximately 12% per year over the course of the next several years based on research published by outside market research firms. We believe our proprietary sample to result platform is best suited to address a subset of this market, including hospital acquired infections and other infectious diseases. C. diff. According to the Agency for Healthcare Research and Quality, there are 347,000 cases of C. diff annually in the United States; Group B Strep. According to the CDC, there were 4.0 million live births in the United States in 2012 and nearly every pregnant woman in the United States is tested for Group B Strep in the late third trimester; Staphylococcus Identification and Resistance Panel. According to a market survey, there are 4.2 million positive blood cultures each year in the United States; Shiga Toxin Producing E. coli. According to the Agency for Healthcare Research and Quality, there were nearly five million U.S. Hospital visits in 2010 for gastrointestinal distress that suggested food borne illness and each of these patients could potentially be tested for STEC; 11 Staph Aureus Pre Surgical Screening. According to the CDC, there were 514 million in patient and outpatient surgeries in the United States in 2010. These surgeries represent the primary market for our SA Pre Surgical Nasal Screen test, as every surgical patient could potentially be tested; and Stool Bacterial Pathogenic Panel. According to the Agency for Healthcare Research and Quality, there were nearly five million U.S. hospital visits in 2010 for gastrointestinal distress that suggested food borne illness and each of these patients could potentially be tested for food borne pathogens. We anticipate that the market for the molecular diagnostic assays on which we are focused will increase significantly over the next several years. We believe that many factors are driving growth of this market, particularly the accelerating adoption of molecular testing inside the hospital micro biology lab. Based on published research we believe that fewer than half of all hospitals are currently using molecular testing for their infectious disease testing. More importantly, we believe that a far smaller fraction of all testing d1 in hospital labs is molecular. We believe that as molecular testing becomes more cost effective, its advantages of faster time to result and higher sensitivity relative to legacy testing methods will lead more and more hospitals to convert to molecular testing. Our diagnostic tests are currently sold in the United States, Europe and New Zealand. We currently utilize a direct sales and support team in the United States and in certain key European countries and New Zealand we utilize distributors, which we expect will be augmented by marketing partners and distributors in other strategic areas as we expand internationally. According to the US Center for Disease Control, in 2011 there were approximately 5,700 hospitals in the United States, approximately 4,900 of which are under 400 beds and which we refer to as small to medium sized hospitals. According to outside research, fewer than half of those smaller hospitals have made the switch to molecular methods for diagnosing infectious disease. Based on our competitors public statements and published independent reports, we believe that 20% of small to medium sized hospitals have a sample to result molecular system. We believe these hospitals are excellent candidates for our molecular diagnostic systems. We believe that our platform will enable these hospitals many of which could not previously afford more expensive or complex molecular diagnostic testing platforms to modernize their laboratory testing and provide better patient care at an affordable cost. The first step to acquiring a customer is an evaluation. During the evaluation period, potential customers utilize our platform alongside their current testing method (molecular or non molecular) and at the end of the evaluation period determine if they are interested in switching to our platform, as evidenced by the purchase of our assays on a recurring basis, or by remaining with their current testing method. Our recent customer and evaluation history is as follows (excluding Staph ID R and STEC diagnostic assays as they were in the beginning stages of the evaluation period) Total U.S. Customers C. Diff Customers C. Diff Penetration Group B Strep Customers Group B Strep Penetration Third Quarter 2014 80 80 100% 0 NA Fourth Quarter 2014 84 84 100% 0 NA First Quarter 2015 101 101 100% 0 NA Second Quarter 2015 115 115 100% 0 NA Third Quarter 2015 143 142 99% 25 17% Fourth Quarter 2015 186 185 99% 47 25% First Quarter 2016 222 219 99% 61 27% Second Quarter 2016 260 253 99% 78 30% Third Quarter 2016 255 248 99% 78 30% Fourth Quarter 2016 244 234 96% 74 30% Research and Development As of December 31, 2016 we had 50 employees focused on research and development. Our research and development expenditures were approximately $134 million and $8.5 million for the years ended 12 December 31, 2016 and 2015, respectively. The increase in research and development expenses from 2015 to 2016 was primarily due to our focus on growing our diagnostic assay pipeline . In the future we expect to continue to allocate resources to developing and obtaining regulatory approval for assays under development and expect to continue developing additional assays and conducting clinical trials . We will also allocate research and development resources to improve our product reliability and enhance our diagnostic cartridge manufacturing process. In addition to the four assays that have received FDA approval, we have 2 assays submitted for FDA approval and four assays in late stage development. Our product offerings will include low plex tests, multi plex panels and direct from whole blood tests or panels. Manufacturing We manufacture our proprietary diagnostic cartridges and analyzers in Salt Lake City, Utah. We currently hand build our diagnostic cartridges and purchase materials at higher per unit cost due to lower purchase volumes. We believe that investment in automation of portions of our manufacturing and assembly process and volume purchase pricing will significantly improve our gross margins and enhance our ability to provide a low cost solution to customers. We perform reagent formulation, diagnostic cartridge manufacturing and packaging of final comp1nts and diagnostic cartridges in accordance with applicable guidelines for medical device manufacturing. We currently lease approximately 33,000 square feet of manufacturing space, which we believe will be adequate to meet our manufacturing needs for the foreseeable future. The lease expires in April 2017 and has 2 options, each for a 3 year renewal term. We also rely on third party suppliers, including sole source suppliers in certain instances, for certain reagents used in our products and much of the disposable comp1nt molding for our test cartridges. We have implemented a quality management platform designed to comply with FDA regulations and ISO standards governing diagnostic medical device products. These regulations carefully control the design, manufacture, testing and release of diagnostic testing products, as well as raw material receipt and control. We also have controlled methods for the consistent manufacturing of our proprietary diagnostic cartridge, and analyzers at our facility. Sales and Marketing Our current sales and marketing strategy is to both expand our footprint of installed hospitals and stand al1 laboratory sites in addition to increasing the number and volume of diagnostic assays utilized at our existing installed base of customers. Our assays are sold in the United States through a nine person direct sales force and a technical specialist service organization of five, which is supported by a centralized team of marketing, customer support, and technical support personnel. Our sales representatives typically have experience in molecular diagnostic testing and a ne2rk of hospital contacts within their respective territories. We utilize our representatives knowledge along with market research databases and relationships with Group Purchasing Organizations (GPOs), Integrated Delivery Ne2rks (IDNs) and other strategic partnerships to target and qualify prospects. We execute a variety of surveys and strategies to determine the buying criteria of the different customer segments we serve, and adapt our offering and strategies to best serve our target audience. To support our expanding molecular assay menu and the anticipated growth in our customer base, we continue to make investments in a variety of market outreach programs, campaigns and technologies. In the United States, our sales process nearly always includes a customer evaluation period during which a site receives training on our platform and on the specific assay(s) they are evaluating. As part of the evaluation process, the evaluating site runs validations against their current method to assess accuracy, overall cost and workflow of the Great Basin platform. Upon successful validation and upon purchase of product, the evaluating entity becomes a customer. This process has taken between 25 and 64 days, depending on the product(s) being evaluated, from the time we install the analyzer at the evaluation site to acceptance as a customer. Our sales cycle has decreased over time due improvements we have made to the selling process and to higher market acceptance of molecular testing for infectious diseases. For example, for our customers 13 that run the C. diff test, during 2014 the sales cycle was 74 days, during the first half of 2015 the sales cycle was 65 days, during the second half of 2015 the sales cycle was 35 days and the sales cycle was 20 days by the end of 2016. The analyzer is provided to the customers for their use with our assay but we retain ownership and control of the analyzer; we refer to our relationship with our customers as a vending machine model (or modified razor razor blade). The customer buys our proprietary diagnostic cartridge from us and utilizes 1 disposable test cartridge each time an assay is run. Our revenue from U.S. customers is derived solely from the sales of assays. We refer to the percentage of customers that elect to switch to our platform and purchase our diagnostic tests after receiving and evaluating our platform as our win rate . This is a metric that we use to determine our sales efficiency and our market acceptance. Our win rate calculation is determined without any minimum or recurring purchase threshold. Our win rates over various periods since we launched our first product commercially are as follows Number of Evaluations Win Rate Full Year 2013 86 69% Full Year 2014 49 76% Full Year 2015 125 85% 1st Quarter 2016 40 85% 2nd Quarter 2016 49 88% 3rd Quarter 2016 24 79% 4th Quarter 2016 7 86% Since Commercial Launch 397 80% We offer our C. diff test and our platform for sale in the European Union and New Zealand through a ne2rk of distributors. Unlike the U.S. market, we sell the platform and assay to the distributor, who then sells them directly to the customer. There were no sales of the analyzer platform during the years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015. Customers For the year ended on December 31, 2016, we did not have any customer that represented more than 5% of our total revenue. For the year ended December 31, 2015 1 customer, Vista Clinical Lab, represented 7.4% of our total revenue. We define customers in terms of the number of customer sites actively reporting results using our platform. As of December 31, 2016, we had 265 customers worldwide (244 in the United States and 21 in the rest of the world), who use an aggregate of 498 analyzers. Our U.S. customers represented approximately 99% of our total revenue for the year ended December 31, 2016 and approximately 98% of our total revenue for the year ended December 31, 2015. We do not enter into sales agreements with our U.S. customers and sell our products using purchase orders. We enter into distribution agreements with distribution partners for sales outside the U.S. Competition We primarily compete with other molecular diagnostic testing manufacturers, such as Cepheid, Meridian Bioscience, Inc., Nanosphere, Inc., Qiagen NV, Roche Diagnostics, Quidel Corporation, bioMerieux (which recently acquired Biofire Diagnostics, Inc.), T2 Biosystems, Becton, Dickinson and Company, GenMark Diagnostics, Inc., Hologic and others. We believe that we compete primarily on the basis of our platform speed, accuracy, ease of use and relatively low cost. We believe that the approval of additional assays will make our solution more attractive to our customers and prospective customers. 14 Many of our competitors have substantially greater financial, technical, research and other resources and larger, more established marketing, sales and distribution organizations than we do. Many of our competitors also offer broader product lines and have greater brand recognition than we do. Moreover, our existing and new competitors may make rapid technological developments that may result in our technologies and products becoming obsolete before we recover the expenses incurred to develop them or before they generate significant revenue. Intellectual Property, Proprietary Technology We integrate capabilities in platform design, development, production and DNA amplification technologies, along with design, development and manufacture of primers, probes, dyes, quenchers and other individual reagent comp1nts. We have and are continuing to develop our own proprietary intellectual property along with licensing specific third party technologies. We have an issued patent covering bpHDA, which is used in our C. diff test. bpHDA, or Blocked Primer Helicase Dependent Amplification, is our patented technology creating target dependent hot start functionality in HDA amplification reactions. bpHDA utilizes a blocked primer technology such that amplification is not activated until the target analyte of interest is bound to the blocked primer at an elevated temperature used for HDA amplification, wherein the block is removed by a highly specific enzyme, allowing for amplification to proceed. We believe this approach significantly improves assay speed and limits of sensitivity such that single cells present in clinical specimens may be amplified to detectable levels in as few as 17 minutes. Multiplex product development is also simplified, allowing for more complex assays in a single reaction with up to four unique primer sets demonstrated to work since December 31, 2014. (BP) HDA Great Basin Proprietary Hot Start Amplification Technology We also have an issued patent for our amplification method in the presence of the coated silicon chip, a method which we intend to use in each of our assays. We also have an issued patent for the AMPED signal amplification method, which we intend to utilize in assays currently under development. The issued patents described above were issued in the United States and each expires in 2029. Our issued patents are pending in Europe and Canada as well. All current maintenance fees payable regarding these issued patents have been paid. Our competitive success will be affected in part by our continued ability to obtain and maintain patent protection for our inventions, technologies and discoveries, including intellectual property that includes technologies that we license. We have patents covering technologies of our own and have licensed technologies from others. Our pending patent applications may lack priority over applications submitted by third parties or may not result in the issuance of 15 patents. Even if issued, our patents may not be sufficiently broad to provide protection against competitors with similar technologies and may be challenged, invalidated or circumvented. In addition to patents, we rely on a combination of trade secrets, copyright and trademark laws, nondisclosure agreements, licenses and other contractual provisions and technical measures to maintain and develop our competitive position with respect to intellectual property. Nevertheless, these measures may not be adequate to safeguard the technology underlying our products. For example, employees, consultants and others who participate in the development of our products may breach their agreements with us regarding our intellectual property, and we may not have adequate remedies for the breach. We also may not be able to effectively protect our intellectual property rights in some foreign countries, as many countries do not offer the same level of legal protection for intellectual property as the United States. Furthermore, for a variety of reasons, we may decide not to file for patent, copyright or trademark protection outside of the United States. Our trade secrets could become known through other unforeseen means. Notwithstanding our efforts to protect our intellectual property, our competitors may independently develop similar or alternative technologies or products that are equal or superior to our technology. Our competitors may also develop similar products without infringing on any of our intellectual property rights or design around our proprietary technologies. Furthermore, any efforts to enforce our proprietary rights could result in disputes and legal proceedings that could be costly and divert attention from our business. We could also be subject to third party claims that we require additional licenses for our products, and such claims could interfere with our business. If our products infringe the intellectual property rights of others, we could face costly litigation, which could cause us to pay substantial damages and limit our ability to sell some or all of our products. Even if our products were determined not to infringe the intellectual property rights of others, we could incur substantial costs in defending any such claims. We hold non exclusive licenses to key technologies from BioHelix related to isothermal amplification of nucleic acid targets, utilizing helicase dependent amplification, or HDA. This license is limited to the fields of human diagnostic testing utilizing our solid chip surface detection and contains diligence and U.S. preference provisions. To date, these technologies have resulted in 3 issued U.S. patents, 1 issued European patent and 1 pending international patent family. Additionally, these technologies may include related technologies that BioHelix may develop in the future. The BioHelix technologies are the basis of our DNA amplification approach. In August 2010, we entered into a license agreement with Integrated DNA Technologies, or IDT, related to the use of blocked primers. The license is exclusive to the fields of amplification utilizing HDA and detection of diagnostic targets in human in vitro diagnostics, but is non exclusive to all oncology and human papilloma virus targets or markers. These technologies have resulted in 3 pending U.S. patent applications and 1 issued European patent. Government Regulation The design, development, manufacture, testing and sale of our molecular diagnostic assays are subject to regulation by numerous governmental authorities, principally the FDA, and corresponding state and foreign regulatory agencies. Regulation by the FDA In the United States, the Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, or FDCA, FDA regulations and other federal and state statutes and regulations govern, among other things, medical device design and development, pre clinical and clinical testing, premarket clearance or approval, registration and listing, manufacturing, labeling, storage, advertising and promotion, sales and distribution, export and import, and post market surveillance. The FDA regulates the design, manufacturing, servicing, sale and distribution of medical devices, including molecular diagnostic test kits and instrumentation platforms. Failure to comply with applicable U.S. requirements may subject a company to a variety of administrative or judicial sanctions, such as FDA refusal to approve pending applications, warning letters, product recalls, product seizures, total or partial suspension of production or distribution, injunctions, fines, civil penalties and criminal prosecution. Unless an exemption applies, each medical device we wish to distribute commercially in the United States will require marketing authorization from the FDA prior to distribution. The 2 primary types of FDA marketing authorization required applicable to a device are premarket notification, also called 510(k) clearance, and premarket approval, also called PMA. The type of marketing authorization required is generally linked to the classification of 16 the device. The FDA classifies medical devices into 1 of 3 classes (Class I, II or III) based on the degree of risk the FDA determines to be associated with a device and the level of regulatory control deemed necessary to ensure the device safety and effectiveness. Devices requiring fewer controls because they are deemed to pose lower risk are placed in Class I. Class I devices are deemed to pose the least risk and are subject only to general controls applicable to all devices, such as requirements for device labeling and adherence to the FDA current Good Manufacturing Practices and Quality Platform Requirements, as reflected in its Quality System Regulation, or QSR. Class II devices are intermediate risk devices that are subject to general controls and may also be subject to special controls such as performance standards, product specific guidance documents, special labeling requirements, patient registries or post market surveillance. Class III devices are high risk devices for which insufficient information exists to assure safety and effectiveness solely through general or special controls. Class III devices include life sustaining, life supporting or implantable devices, devices of substantial importance in preventing impairment of human health, or which present a potential, unreasonable risk of illness or injury. Most Class I devices and some Class II devices are exempted by regulation from FDA premarket review requirement and can be commercialized without prior authorization from the FDA. Some Class I devices that have not been so exempted and most Class II devices are eligible for marketing through the 510(k) clearance process. By contrast, devices placed in Class III generally require PMA or 510(k) de novo clearance prior to commercial marketing. Our Stool Bacterial Pathogen Panel and Group B Strep Test are both Class I devices and are eligible for marketing through the 510(k) clearance process. Our C. Diff test and Staphylococcus Identification and Resistance Panel are Class II devices and also are eligible for marketing through the 510(k) clearance process. Our 2 assays currently under FDA review have been submitted as Class II devices with a 501(k) application. 510(k) Clearance To obtain 510(k) clearance for a medical device, an applicant must submit a premarket notification to the FDA demonstrating that the device is substantially equivalent to a device legally marketed in the United States that is not subject to PMA, commonly known as the predicate device. A device is substantially equivalent if, with respect to the predicate device, it has the same intended use and has either (i) the same technological characteristics or (ii) different technological characteristics and the information submitted demonstrates that the device is as safe and effective as a legally marketed device and does not raise different questions of safety or effectiveness. Demonstration of substantial equivalence may require clinical data. Although completion of the 510(k) review process is targeted for 90 days, these reviews typically take longer (e.g., up to 12 months or more) due to stoppage of the FDA review clock to address requests for additional information. Payment of a user fee is required for the FDA to initiate review of a 510(k) submission. After a device has received 510(k) clearance for a specific intended use, any change or modification that significantly affects its safety or effectiveness, such as a significant change in the design, materials, method of manufacture or intended use, may require a new 510(k) clearance or PMA. The determination as to whether or not a modification could significantly affect the device safety or effectiveness is initially left to the manufacturer using available FDA guidance; however, the FDA may review this determination to evaluate the regulatory status of the modified product at any time and may require the manufacturer to cease marketing and recall the modified device until 510(k) clearance or PMA is obtained. The manufacturer may also be subject to significant regulatory fines or penalties. Before submitting a medical device for 510(k) clearance, a series of studies (e.g., method comparison, precision, reproducibility, interference and stability studies) must be conducted to characterize the performance of the test. In addition, clinical studies may be required to validate these performance characteristics in a clinical setting as well as to ensure that the intended users can perform the test successfully. Although clinical investigations of most devices are subject to the investigational device exemption, or IDE, requirements, clinical investigations of molecular diagnostic tests, including our assays and assays under development, are generally exempt from the IDE requirements. Thus, clinical investigations by intended users for intended uses of our assays generally do not require the FDA prior approval, provided the clinical evaluation 17 testing is non invasive, does not require an invasive sampling procedure that presents a significant risk, does not intentionally introduce energy into the subject and is not used as a diagnostic procedure without confirmation by another medically established test or procedure. In addition, products must be appropriately labeled per FDA regulations to reflect the intended use of the product (e.g., for research use only or for investigational use only) and distribution controls must be established to assure that such products are distributed for those specified purposes. PMA Applications PMA applications must be supported by valid scientific evidence, which typically requires extensive performance data, including technical, pre clinical, clinical and stability data, to demonstrate the safety and effectiveness of the device. A PMA application must also include a complete description of the device and its comp1nts, a detailed description of the methods, facilities and controls used to manufacture the device, and the proposed labeling. Payment of a user fee is required for FDA to initiate review of a PMA application. During the PMA application review period, the FDA may request additional information or clarification of information provided in the application. In addition, the FDA will conduct a pre approval inspection of the manufacturing facility or facilities to ensure compliance with the QSR, which requires manufacturers to follow design, testing, control, documentation and other quality assurance procedures. Although FDA review of an initial PMA application is required by statute to take between six to ten months, these reviews typically take longer (e.g., up to 2 years) due to stoppage of the FDA review clock to address requests for additional information. The FDA can delay, limit or deny approval of a PMA application for many reasons, including if it is not demonstrated that there is reasonable assurance that the device is safe or effective under the conditions of use prescribed, recommended or suggested in the proposed labeling; if the data from pre clinical studies and clinical trials may be insufficient to support approval; and if the manufacturing process, methods, controls or facilities used for the manufacture, processing, packing or installation of the device do not meet applicable requirements. If the FDA evaluations of both the PMA application and the manufacturing facilities are favorable, the FDA will either issue an approval letter or an approvable letter, which may contain conditions that must be met in order to secure final approval of the PMA application. If the FDA evaluation of the PMA application or manufacturing facilities is not favorable, the FDA will deny approval of the application or issue a not approvable letter. A not approvable letter will outline the deficiencies in the application and, where practical, will identify what is necessary to make the application approvable. The FDA may also determine that additional studies (pre clinical and or clinical studies) are necessary, in which case the PMA may be delayed for several months or years while these studies are conducted and the subsequent amendment to the PMA application is submitted. Once granted, approval of the PMA application may be withdrawn by the FDA if compliance with post approval requirements, conditions of approval or other regulatory standards are not maintained or problems are identified following initial marketing. Post approval modifications to the manufacturing process, labeling, device specifications, materials or design of a Class III device may require approval of a PMA supplement. PMA supplements require submission of technical data to support implementation of the proposed change to the Class III device. Payment of a user fee is required for FDA to initiate review of a PMA supplement. Regulation after FDA Clearance or Approval Any devices we manufacture or distribute pursuant to clearance or approval by the FDA are subject to comprehensive and continuing regulation by the FDA and certain state agencies. We are required to adhere to applicable regulations setting forth detailed GMP requirements, as set forth in the QSR, which includes testing, control and documentation requirements. Non compliance with these standards can result in fines, injunctions, civil penalties, recalls or seizures of products, total or partial suspension of production, refusal of the government to grant 510(k) clearance or PMA of devices, withdrawal of marketing approvals and criminal prosecutions. We have 18 designed and implemented quality platform processes within our manufacturing facilities in order to comply with FDA GMP requirements. Because we are a medical device manufacturer, we must also comply with the FDA medical device reporting requirements whenever there is evidence that reasonably suggests that 1 of our products may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury. We must also report any incident in which our product has malfuncti1d if that malfunction would likely cause or contribute to a death or serious injury if it were to recur. Labeling, advertising, and promotional activities are subject to scrutiny by the FDA and, in certain circumstances, by the Federal Trade Commission. Medical devices approved or cleared by the FDA may not be promoted for unapproved or uncleared uses, otherwise known as off label promotion. The FDA and other agencies actively enforce the laws and regulations prohibiting the promotion of off label uses, and a company that is found to have improperly promoted off label uses may be subject to significant liability, including substantial m1tary penalties and criminal prosecution. We have implemented quality platform processes and advertising promotional policies designed to comply with these requirements. Our facilities are also subject to periodic inspection by the FDA and foreign regulatory agencies for, among other things, conformance to the FDA QSR and current Good Manufacturing Practice requirements, as well as applicable foreign or international standards. The results of these inspections can include inspectional observations, which are recorded on FDA Form 483, regarding potential violations of the FDCA and related laws, warning letters, or other forms of enforcement. On February 27, 2013, the FDA issued a Form 483 after inspecting our manufacturing facility in Salt Lake City, Utah. The Form 483 included 17 observations of non compliance with FDA requirements. These observations included the material finding of the FDA inspection which were noted in the Form 483 were that we did not have appropriate environmental testing to ensure that our contamination controls were adequate and our design history file was not complete. The FDA observations listed on a Form 483 do not constitute a final determination that we were in violation of any law or regulation and in response to the Form 483 we took corrective actions to address all 17 observations, including revising manufacturing and quality procedures, training personnel, and reconfiguring our existing manufacturing facilities, and informed the FDA that all observations had been resolved in a final update letter on February 7, 2014. We received a letter from the FDA, dated July 22, 2014, informing us that the inspection is closed. We do not anticipate the FDA to take further action or provide further notice with regard to this matter. International Regulations International sales of medical devices are subject to foreign governmental regulations, which vary substantially from country to country. The time required to obtain certification or approval by a foreign country may be longer or shorter than that required for FDA approval, and the requirements may differ. The European Union, or EU, which consists of 25 member countries, has adopted numerous directives and has promulgated voluntary standards regulating the design, manufacture, labeling, clinical trials and adverse event reporting for medical devices. Devices that comply with the requirements of relevant directives will be entitled to bear CE conformity marking, and, accordingly, can be commercially distributed throughout the member states of the European Union and other countries that comply with or mirror these directives. The method for assessing conformity varies depending upon the type and class of the product, but normally involves a combination of self assessment by the manufacturer and a third party assessment by a notified body, which is an independent and neutral institution appointed by a country to conduct the conformity assessment. This third party assessment may consist of an audit of the manufacturer quality system and specific testing of the manufacturer device. Such an assessment in 1 country within the EU is required for a manufacturer to commercially distribute the product throughout the EU. In addition, compliance with voluntary harmonizing standards ISO 9001 and ISO 13845 issued by the International Organization for Standards establishes the presumption of conformity with the essential requirements for a CE marking. In order to maintain CE Mark certification, we are subject to both announced and unannounced inspections by the notified body. Significant changes to the device or manufacturer quality system are also subject to approval by the notified body. Reporting of certain adverse events and product recalls to the national health authorities is required for compliance with the directive. Member states may also require registration of devices and translation of labeling into national languages. 19 Environmental Regulations We are also subject to numerous federal, state and local laws relating to such matters as safe working conditions, manufacturing practices, environmental protection, fire hazard control and disposal of hazardous or potentially hazardous substances. Some of these laws require us to obtain licenses or permits to conduct our operations. We have numerous policies and quality platform procedures in place to ensure compliance with these laws and to minimize the risk of occupational exposure to hazardous materials. We do not expect the operations of our products to produce significant quantities of hazardous or toxic waste or radiation that would require the use of extraordinary disposal practices. Although the costs to comply with these applicable laws and regulations have not been material, we cannot predict the impact on our business of new or amended laws or regulations or any changes in the way existing and future laws and regulations are interpreted or enforced, nor can we ensure we will be able to obtain or maintain any required licenses or permits. Export Regulations Medical devices that are legally marketed in the United States may be exported anywhere in the world without prior FDA notification or approval. Devices that have not been approved or cleared in the United States must follow the export provisions of the FDCA. Depending on which section of the FDCA we may export under, we may need to request an export permit letter or export certificate, or we may need to submit a simple notification. Export certificates may be requested by foreign customers or foreign governments to provide proof of the products status as regulated by the FDA. The export certificate is prepared by FDA and contains information about a product regulatory or marketing status in the United States. Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments of 1988 ( CLIA ) The use of our assays is also affected by CLIA, and related federal and state regulations, which provide for regulation of laboratory testing. Any customers using our assays for clinical use in the United States will be regulated under CLIA, which establishes quality standards for all laboratory testing to ensure the accuracy, reliability and timeliness of patient test results regardless of where the test was performed. In particular, these regulations mandate that clinical laboratories must be certified by the federal government or a federally approved accreditation agency, or must be located in a state that has been deemed exempt from CLIA requirements because the state has in effect laws that provide for requirements equal to or more stringent than CLIA requirements. Moreover, these laboratories must meet quality assurance, quality control and personnel standards, and they must undergo proficiency testing and inspections. The CLIA standards applicable to clinical laboratories are based on the complexity of the method of testing performed by the laboratory, which range from waived to moderate complexity to high complexity. We expect our future assays to all be rated moderately complex or meet the CLIA waiver criteria for tests that are simple and are judged by the FDA to process a low risk for err1ous results. Foreign Government Regulation Although it is not a current focus we intend to market our products in European and other select international markets in the future. The regulatory pre market requirements for molecular devices vary from country to country. Some countries impose product standards, packaging requirements, labeling requirements and import restrictions on devices. Each country has its own tariff regulations, duties and tax requirements. Failure to comply with applicable foreign regulatory requirements may subject us to fines, suspension or withdrawal of regulatory approvals, product recalls, seizure of products, operating restrictions and criminal prosecution. For products sold in the European Economic Area, we have self declared a Declaration of Conformity under the relevant sections of the applicable European Community standards and other normative documents. Fraud and Abuse Regulations We are subject to numerous federal and state healthcare anti fraud laws, including the federal anti kickback statute and False Claims Act that are intended to reduce waste, fraud and abuse in the healthcare industry. These laws are broad and subject to evolving interpretations. They prohibit many arrangements and practices that are lawful in industries other than healthcare, including certain payments for consulting and other personal services, some discounting arrangements, the provision of gifts and business courtesies, the furnishing of free supplies and services, 20 and waivers of payments. In addition, many states have enacted or are considering laws that limit arrangements between medical device manufacturers and physicians and other healthcare providers and require significant public disclosure concerning permitted arrangements. These laws are vigorously enforced against medical device manufacturers and have resulted in manufacturers paying significant fines and penalties and being subject to stringent corrective action plans and reporting obligations. We believe that we operate our business within the requirements of these laws . A failure to comply with these laws could require us to expend significant resources on investigation, remediation and m1tary penalties. We must, and do, operate our business within the requirements of these laws and, if we are ever accused of violating them, we could be forced to expend significant resources on investigation, remediation and m1tary penalties. Employees As of December 31, 2016, we had 190 full time employees located in Salt Lake City, Utah and other locations throughout the United States. We also contract for hire with 2 outside consultants and contractors. On February 10, 2017, we implemented a workforce reduction plan constituting approximately 26% of our workforce, resulting in the elimination of 49 employees nationwide. Available Information We are required to file annual reports on Form 10 K, quarterly reports on Form 10 Q, current reports on Form 8 K and other information with the SEC. We are subject to the informational requirements of the Exchange Act and file or furnish reports, proxy statements, and other information with the SEC. Copies of these materials, filed by us with the SEC, are available free of charge on our website at www.gbscience.com . These filings are available as soon as reasonably practicable after we electronically file such material with, or furnish it to, the SEC. You can also obtain copies of these materials by visiting the SEC Public Reference Room at 100 F Street, NE, Washington, D.C. 20549, by calling the SEC at 1 800 SEC 0330, or by accessing the SEC website at www.sec.gov. The information on, or that may be accessed through, these websites is not incorporated into this filing and should not be considered a part of this filing. ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS. An investment in our securities involves a high degree of risk. Before you invest in our securities, you should give careful consideration to the following risk factors, in addition to the other information included in this annual report, including our financial statements and related notes, before deciding whether to invest in our securities. The occurrence of any of the adverse developments described in the following risk factors could materially and adversely harm our business, financial condition, results of operations or prospects. In that case, the trading price of our common stock could decline, and you may lose all or part of your investment. Risks Relating to Our Financial Position and Need for Additional Capital We expect that we will need substantial additional funding to expand our commercialization efforts for our C. diff and Group B Strep assay and other new assays. Molecular diagnostic development, which includes research and development, pre clinical and human clinical trials, is a time consuming and expensive process that takes years to complete. We expect that our expenses will increase substantially as we move new assays through human clinical trials, seek regulatory approvals, and pursue development of additional innovations. If we obtain marketing approval for the diagnostic tests that we develop, license, or acquire, we expect to incur significant commercialization expenses related to regulatory compliance requirements, sales and marketing, manufacturing, and distribution. Net loss for the years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015 was approximately $89.1 million and $57.9 million, respectively. As of December 31, 2016, we had an accumulated deficit of $2111 million. As discussed in Note 3 to the audited financial statements, our recurring operating losses from operations and our need for additional sources of capital to fund our ongoing operations raise substantial doubt about our ability to continue as a going concern. We expect to continue to incur operating losses for the foreseeable future, and we anticipate these losses will increase as we continue our development and commercialization of our platform, and seek regulatory approval for additional assays. Accordingly, our ability to 21 continue as a going concern depends on our ability to obtain additional financing to fund our operations, and there can be no assurance that additional financing will be available to us or that such financing, if available, will be available on favorable terms. Even if we achieve profitability in the future, we may not be able to sustain profitability in subsequent periods. We expect that we will need additional funding to manufacture analyzers to be used by potential customers during the sales evaluation phase. Our potential customers evaluate the performance of our products through the use of analyzers that we manufacture and provide at no cost. Our ability to grow our customer base depends upon our ability to obtain additional financing to fund the manufacturing of analyzers to deliver to such potential customers. Our inability to raise capital on acceptable terms in the future may cause us to delay, diminish, or curtail certain operational activities, including research and development activities, clinical trials, sales and marketing, and other operations, in order to reduce costs and sustain the business, and such inability would have a material adverse effect on our business and financial condition. We expect capital outlays and operating expenditures to increase over the next several years as we work to expand our commercial activities, expand our development activities, conduct clinical trials, expand manufacturing operations and expand our infrastructure. We may need to raise additional capital to, among other things fund clinical trials and pre clinical trials for our assays under development as requested or required by regulatory agencies; sustain commercialization of our C. diff, Group B Strep, e. coli, and Staph ID R assays and assays under development or review by the FDA; continue the commercial launch and sale of our Staph ID R assay; expand and automate our manufacturing capabilities and reduce our cost of sales; increase our sales and marketing efforts to drive market adoption and address competitive developments; finance capital expenditures and our general and administrative expenses; develop new assays; maintain, expand and protect our intellectual property portfolio; add operational, financial and management information systems; and hire additional research and development, quality control, scientific, and general and administrative personnel. Our present and future funding requirements will depend on many factors, including but not limited to the progress and timing of our clinical trials; the level of research and development investment required to maintain and improve our technology position; the cost of filing, prosecuting, defending and enforcing patent claims and other intellectual property rights, if any; our efforts to acquire or license complementary technologies or acquire complementary businesses; changes in product development plans needed to address any difficulties in commercialization or changing market conditions; competing technological and market developments; changes in regulatory policies or laws that may affect our operations; and changes in physician acceptance or medical society recommendations that may affect commercial efforts. 22 We may not be able to continue to operate as a going concern. Our independent registered public accounting firm has included an explanatory paragraph relating to our ability to continue as a going concern in its report on our audited financial statements. Our ability to continue as a going concern is contingent upon, among other factors, the release of restricted cash related to our convertible notes upon satisfaction of the conditions set forth in the terms of the convertible notes, refinance or existing debt arrangements or obtaining alternate financing. We cannot provide any assurance that we will be able to raise additional capital. If we are unable to secure additional capital, refinance our existing debt or gain access to the cash in the restricted accounts, we may be required to curtail our business plans and initiatives and take additional measures to reduce costs in order to conserve our cash in amounts sufficient to sustain operations and meet our obligations. We have a history of highly dilutive financings and reverse stock splits which amplifies the dilutive effect of these financings on our stockholders. Any investment in our common stock will likely be highly diluted through the future conversion of our outstanding derivative securities and our likely future capital raising efforts. In the past 12 months, the Company has conducted 3 (3) stock splits to address the Company need to issue shares of common stock to raise capital to fund ongoing operations. These stock splits were as follows Date Reverse Split Ratio March 30, 2016 35 to 1 September 16, 2016 80 to 1 December 28, 2016 300 to 1 Cumulative Ratio 840,000 to 1 The multiple stock splits permitted the Company to issue a large number of shares of common stock pursuant to issued and outstanding convertible securities as well as conduct several public offerings to raise additional capital for operations. The conversion of these derivative securities resulted in the substantial dilution of stockholders over the course of the last 12 months. The following table sets forth the number of post split shares that were issued upon conversion of these derivative securities, the post split average conversion price, the number of pre split shares (being the number of share equivalents prior to the 3 reverse stock splits, calculated by multiplying post split shares by the cumulative ratio of 840,000 to 1) and the pre split equivalent conversion prices. Post Split Pre Split Pre Split Average Equivalent Equivalent Post Split Conversion Shares Issued Conversion Security Shares Issued Price (millions) Price Series C Warrants 90 $ 112,392,000 76 $ 13380 2015 Convertible Notes 325,121 $ 4200 273,102 $ 0.00 Series F Preferred Stock 438,759 $ 6.00 368,558 $ 0.00 2016 Convertible Notes 1,485,139,803 $ 0.00 1,247,517,435 $ 0.00 Total 1,485,903,773 $ 0.00 1,248,159,169 $ 0.00 The large number of pre split equivalent shares of common stock issued is due primarily to 3 factors (1) the conversion price of the 2015 Notes being tied to a discount to the market price on the date of the installment payments, (2) the continued decline in the price of the Company shares of common stock following each of the reverse splits (3) the conversion of a large number of Series F Preferred Stock at the current post conversion price of $0.002 per $1,000 principal amount of each share of Series F Preferred Stock and (4) the conversion price of the 2016 Notes being tied to a discount to the market price on the date of conversion. Following each reverse split, the issuance of common stock pursuant to these derivative securities and other market factors resulted in a rapid decline in the market price of our common stock. This decline in market price resulted in a greater number of shares of common stock being issued to settle conversion of these derivative securities which was amplified over time by the cumulative effective of the reverse split ratios. 23 In order to maintain flexibility to settle our obligations under our convertible notes issued on July 1, 2016 (the 2016 Notes ), and our Series F Preferred Stock through the issuance of shares and to permit the Company to have available additional shares of common stock to pursue further financing for the Company as needed, our board of directors has unanimously determined that it is in the best interests of the Company and our stockholders to amend the Company Certificate of Incorporation to effect the a reverse stock split at a ratio between 1 for 1,700 and 1 for 2,000 (the 2017 Reverse Stock Split ) and to the effect the Share Increase (the Authorized Share Increase ). At a special meeting of stockholders held on March 9, 2017, our stockholders (i) approved a reverse split of our common stock at a ratio between 1 for 1,700 and 1 for 2,000, to be effective upon a date on or prior to May 31, 2017, such ratio and date to be determined by our Board and (ii) approved the increase to our authorized common stock from 1,500,000,000 shares to 3,000,000,000 shares. It is anticipated that the Company will issue a majority of those shares of common stock primarily as follows (i) to settle conversion of the Company outstanding Series F Preferred Stock, (ii) to settle conversion of the Company outstanding $322 million of 2016 Notes outstanding as of March 17, 2017 and (iii) to raise additional capital through 1 or more offerings of equity or equity linked securities. Both the Series F Preferred Stock (beginning July 2017) and the 2016 Notes have conversion prices that are tied to a discount to the Company recent average trading price. As a result, if after the 2017 Reverse Stock Split is effective and the stock price again declines, the number of post split shares that must be issued to settle these securities will increase and the pre split equivalent number of shares will increase rapidly due to the large proposed ratios of 1,700 for 1 and 2,000 for 1 The dilution to current stockholders will be substantial; similar to the effect of past stock splits. Our board of directors believes that the 2017 Reverse Stock Split could also facilitate our efforts to raise capital to fund our operations. We will need to raise additional capital and may elect to do so through the issuance of equity or convertible debt securities. The 2017 Reverse Stock Split would reduce the number of shares of common stock outstanding without reducing the total number of authorized shares of common stock. As a result, we would have a larger number of authorized but unissued shares from which to issue additional shares of common stock, or securities convertible or exercisable into shares of common stock, in equity or convertible debt financing transactions. As of the date hereof, we have no specific plans, arrangements or understandings, whether written or oral, with respect to the increase in shares available for issuance as a result of the proposed reverse stock split or the increase in authorized shares. Raising additional capital will cause dilution to our existing stockholders, and restrict our operations or require us to relinquish certain intellectual property rights. We will seek additional capital through a combination of public and private equity offerings, debt financings, strategic partnerships and alliances, licensing arrangements and grants. To the extent that we raise additional capital through the sale of equity or convertible debt securities, the ownership interest of our existing stockholders may be diluted, and the terms may include liquidation or other preferences that adversely affect the rights of our stockholders. Debt and receivables financings may be coupled with an equity comp1nt, such as warrants to purchase shares, which could also result in dilution of our existing stockholders ownership. The incurrence of indebtedness would result in increased fixed payment obligations and could also result in certain restrictive covenants, such as limitations on our ability to incur additional debt, limitations on our ability to acquire or license intellectual property rights and other operating restrictions that could adversely impact our ability to conduct our business. If we raise additional funds through strategic partnerships and alliances and licensing arrangements with third parties, we may have to relinquish valuable rights to our product candidates, or grant licenses on terms that are not favorable to us. A failure to obtain adequate funds may cause us to curtail certain operational activities, including research and development, regulatory trials, sales and marketing, and manufacturing operations, in order to reduce costs and sustain the business, and would have a material adverse effect on our business and financial condition. 24 The issuance of shares of our common stock pursuant to the Series D warrants, 2016 Notes and related Series H warrants and the Series F Preferred Stock will result in significant dilution to our stockholders. At a special meeting of our shareholders held on March 9, 2017, our shareholders approved a reverse split of our common stock at a ratio between 1 for 1,700 and 1 for 2,000, to be effective upon a date on or prior to May 31, 2017, such ratio and date to be determined by our Board. This reverse split of our common stock will mean that our stockholders will experience significant dilution as a result of shares of common stock issued pursuant to our outstanding 2016 Notes, Series F Preferred Stock, Series D Warrants and Series H warrants. Under the Series D warrants, 2016 Notes and related Series H warrants and Series F Preferred Stock, we are required to have reserved or have designated for future issuance a number of shares of common stock necessary to effect the conversion of such convertible notes and preferred stock and the exercise of the Series D warrants and Series H warrants, subject to potential future anti dilution adjustments. The price at which the Company will convert the 2016 Notes installment amounts is equal to the lowest of (x) $0.50 per share, subject to adjustment as provided therein, (y) 85% of the lower of (I) the lowest volume weighted average price of the common stock and (II) the lowest closing bid price of the common stock, in each case, during the five (5) consecutive trading day period ending on, and including, the trading day on which the holder delivers a conversion notice to the Company (such trading prices to be appropriately adjusted for any share dividend, share split, share combination, reclassification or similar transaction during such five (5) consecutive trading day period), and (z) 85% of the volume weighted average price of the common stock during the period beginning at 93001 a.m., New York time (or such other time as the principal market publicly announces the official opening of trading), and ending at 10000 p.m., New York time, on the delivery date of the applicable conversion notice; provided however, during the period through and including January 24, 2017 to February 15, 2017, the conversion price shall not be lowered to an amount lower than 90% of the volume weighted average price of the common stock on the delivery date of the applicable conversion notice. For conversions at the election of the holder that are not subject to a floor price pursuant to the terms of the 2016 Notes as originally issued, and at the current conversion price of $0.00068 per share as of March 17, 2017 for such conversions, the $322 million in principal amount of 2016 Notes would be convertible into 47.4 billion shares of our common stock. For conversions in relation to the 2016 Notes amortization payments on the convertible notes, if the stock price continues to decline, the number of pre split equivalent shares of common stock issued could be significantly higher than 47.4 billion shares. If we don t have sufficient authorized capital to issue these shares we would need to seek another reverse stock split which would result in further substantial dilution to shareholders, an increase in our authorized share capital or settle the 2016 Notes in cash, if available. Further, we issued Series D and 2015 Subordination warrants issuable to acquire 17.1% of our issued and outstanding shares of common stock on a fully diluted basis, which were subject to a 1 time reset on December 31, 2016 to 17.1% of our fully diluted shares of common stock on that date. As of March 17, 2017, following such adjustment, the Series D and 2015 Subordination warrants were exercisable to acquire 2,432,599 shares of common stock at an exercise price of $0.00068 per share, subject to adjustment for subsequent issuances. Further in connection with the 2016 Note, the Series H warrants that were issued in July 2016 became exercisable as of January 1, 2017. The Series H warrants are exercisable into 2,346 shares of common stock at the current exercise price of $0.00068 per share, subject to adjustment for certain subsequent issuances. The Series F Preferred Stock is currently convertible at the election of the holder into shares of our common stock at a conversion price equal to $0.00068, subject to adjustments. From and after July 3, 2017, the Series F Preferred Stock shall be convertible at a conversion price equal to 85% of the arithmetic average, in each case of the lower of (i) the 3 lowest daily weighted average prices of the our common stock during the twenty (20) consecutive trading day period ending on the trading day immediately preceding the date of determination and (iii) the weighted average price of the our common stock on the trading day immediately preceding the date of determination. On November 3, 2016, 2,098 Series F Preferred shares were mandatorily converted into 349,667 shares of our common stock at a conversion price of $6.00 per share. On November 3, 2018, so long as no Triggering Event then exists, any remaining Preferred Shares then outstanding shall be converted into shares of our common stock at a conversion 25 price of $6.00 per share. In each case, shares of our common stock will be held in abeyance to the extent necessary to satisfy limitations on beneficial ownership as described in the Certificate of Designations for the Series F Preferred Stock. As of March 17, 2017 we had converted 2,576 Series F Preferred Shares into 429,334 shares of common stock. As of March 17, 2017, based on 5,860 shares of Series F Preferred Stock issued and outstanding, at a conversion price of $0.00068 per share, we could potentially issue up to 8.6 billion shares of our common stock on conversion of Series F Preferred Stock. If the stock price declines following the Reverse Stock Split, the number of pre split equivalent shares of Common Stock issued could be significantly higher than 8.6 billion. Due to the variable nature of the adjustments of the 2016 Notes and Series F Preferred Stock conversion prices and the formula which sets certain conversion prices of these securities based on a discount to the then current market price, the Company could issue substantially more shares of common stock upon conversion of these securities than anticipated above. This is especially the case when the Company conducts reverse stock splits which may increase the per share price in the market but the price may subsequently drop below the immediate post split price. Although we have the option to settle the principal payments on the 2016 Notes in cash and certain conversion and exercise restrictions are placed upon the holders of the 2016 Notes, Series F Preferred Stock, Series D Warrants and Series H Warrants, the issuance of material amounts of common stock by us would cause our stockholders to experience significant dilution in their investment in the Company. We may be at risk of securities class action litigation. We may be at risk of securities class action litigation. This risk is especially relevant for us due to our dependence on positive clinical trial outcomes and regulatory approvals of our diagnostic tests. In the past, life science companies have experienced significant stock price volatility, particularly when associated with binary events such as clinical trials and product approvals. Additionally, due to our price volatility and our high demand for cash to fund operations, we have had to conduct a number of reverse stock splits and highly dilutive financings to continue as a going concern which exposes us to additional risk of securities class action litigation. If we face such litigation, it could result in substantial costs and a diversion of management attention and resources, which could harm our business and results in a decline in the market price of our common stock. If such lawsuits were successful we may not be able to pay awarded damages and we may be forced into bankruptcy which would likely result in the complete loss of your investment. Market and economic conditions may negatively impact our business, financial condition and share price. In recent years, concerns over inflation, energy costs, geopolitical issues, the U.S. mortgage market and a declining real estate market, unstable global credit markets and financial conditions, and volatile oil prices have led to periods of significant economic instability, diminished liquidity and credit availability, declines in consumer confidence and discretionary spending, diminished expectations for the global economy and expectations of slower global economic growth going forward, increased unemployment rates, and increased credit defaults. Our general business strategy may be adversely affected by any such economic downturns, volatile business environments and unstable or unpredictable economic and market conditions. If these conditions occur, deteriorate or do not improve, it may make any necessary debt or equity financing more difficult to complete, more costly, and more dilutive. Failure to secure any necessary financing in a timely manner and on favorable terms could have a material adverse effect on our growth strategy, financial performance, and share price and could require us to delay or abandon development or commercialization plans. In addition, there is a risk that 1 or more of our current and future service providers, manufacturers, suppliers, hospitals and other medical facilities, our third party payors, and other partners could be negatively affected by these difficult economic times, which could adversely affect our ability to attain our operating goals on schedule and on budget or meet our business and financial objectives. Our ability to use our net operating loss carryforwards is limited. As of December 31, 2016, we had federal income tax net operating loss, or NOL, carryforwards of approximately $46.7 million and state income tax NOL carryforwards of approximately $416 million. These NOL carryforwards, if not previously used, will begin to expire in 2023 During 2015 we experienced a shift in our stock ownership within the meaning of Section 382 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or the Code, or under 26 applicable state tax laws that currently subject our NOL carryforwards to an annual limitation. Accordingly, we were required to write off $232 million of net operating loss carryforwards. If we experience a shift in our stock ownership and earn net taxable income in the future, the limitations on our ability to use our NOL carryforwards to reduce U.S. federal and state tax liabilities will result in increased future tax liability to us. We have identified a material weakness in our internal control over financial reporting that, if not properly remediated, could result in material misstatements in our financial statements in future periods. Management identified the following material weakness that continues to be a material weakness as of December 31, 2016 We did not design and maintain effective controls to analyze complex and non routine transactions or adequately review the accounting and or disclosure for these transactions. The nature of our financing agreements increases the complexity of our accounting for potential fair value liabilities. As we enter into additional equity or debt financing transactions, which may have contractual provisions different from those of our existing financing instruments, the accounting and valuation of these financial instruments may become increasingly complicated. This additional complexity could increase the chance that we experience additional errors in the future, particularly because we have a material weakness in our internal control. Because of the material weakness described above, management concluded that the Company did not maintain effective internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2016, based on criteria in Internal Control Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (COSO). With respect to the remediation of the material weakness, we have hired additional accounting and IT personnel to help improve our segregation of duties. We continue to engage third party consultants to assist us with our evaluation of complex technical accounting matters, including the valuation and accounting for our complex derivative agreements. We also continue to engage consultants to advise us on making further improvements to our internal control over financial reporting. We believe that these additional resources will enable us to broaden the scope and quality of our controls relating to the oversight and review of financial statements and our application of relevant accounting policies. These remediation efforts are still in process and have not yet been completed. We cannot assure you that the steps taken will remediate such weakness, nor can we be certain of whether additional actions will be required or the costs of any such actions. We may need to take additional measures to fully mitigate these issues, and the measures we have taken, and expect to take, to improve our internal controls may not be sufficient to address the issues identified, to ensure that our internal controls are effective or to ensure that the identified material weaknesses or significant deficiencies or other material weaknesses or deficiencies will not result in a material misstatement of our annual or interim financial statements. In addition, other material weaknesses or deficiencies may be identified in the future. If we are unable to correct material weaknesses or deficiencies in internal controls in a timely manner, our ability to record, process, summarize and report financial information accurately and within the time periods specified in the rules and forms of the SEC will be adversely affected, and could result in material misstatements in our financial statements in future periods. This failure could negatively affect the market price and trading liquidity of our common stock, cause investors to lose confidence in our reported financial information, subject us to civil and criminal investigations and penalties, and generally materially and adversely impact our business and financial condition. Risks Related to the Convertible Note Financings Our obligations to the holders of our 2016 Notes are secured by a security interest in substantially all of our assets, so if we default on those obligations, the convertible note holders could foreclose on our assets. Our obligations under the 2016 Notes and the transaction documents relating to those convertible notes are secured by a security interest in substantially all of our assets. As a result, if we default under our obligations under the 2016 27 Notes or the transaction documents, the holders of such convertible notes, acting through their appointed agent, could foreclose on their security interests and liquidate some or all of these assets, which would harm our business, financial condition and results of operations and could require us to reduce or cease operations. The holders of the 2016 Notes have certain additional rights upon an event of default under such convertible notes which could harm our business, financial condition and results of operations and could require us to reduce or cease or operations. Under the 2016 Notes, the holders have certain rights upon an event of default. Such rights include (i) the remaining principal amount of the convertible notes bearing interest at a rate of 10% per annum, (ii) during the event of default the conversion price being adjusted to the lowest of (a) the conversion price then in effect, (b) 75% of the lowest weighted average price of the common stock during the 30 consecutive trading day period ending on the trading day immediately preceding the date of the event of default conversion and (c) 75% of the weighted average price of the common stock on the date of the applicable event of default conversion, and (iii) the holder having the right to demand redemption of all or a portion of the convertible notes, as described below. At any time after certain notice requirements for an event of default are triggered, a holder of convertible notes may require us to redeem all or any portion of the convertible note by delivering written notice. Each portion of the convertible note subject to redemption would be redeemed by us in cash by wire transfer of immediately available funds at a price equal to the greater of (x) 125% of the conversion amount being redeemed and (y) the product of (A) the conversion amount being redeemed and (B) the quotient determined by dividing (I) the greatest closing price of the shares of common stock during the period beginning on the date immediately preceding such event of default and ending on the date the holder delivers the redemption notice, by (II) the lowest conversion price in effect during such period. We may not have sufficient funds to settle the redemption price and, as described above, this could trigger rights under the security interest granted to the holders and result in the foreclosure of their security interests and liquidation of some or all of our assets. The exercise of any of these rights upon an event of default could substantially harm our financial condition and force us to reduce or cease operations. The Company is in default as of February 28, 2017 on the dollar value of daily trading and stock price requirement in the equity conditions under the 2016 Notes. If the Company does not obtain a waiver or an amendment to equity conditions to lower the stock price requirement, then the Company will not be able to convert amortization payments under the 2016 Notes and the restrictions on cash held in the Company restricted accounts will not be released, either of which will harm our financial condition, could force us to declare bankruptcy and could result in the loss of your entire investment. The release of restrictions on cash held in the Company restricted accounts on certain dates under the terms of the 2016 Notes depends upon the Company satisfaction of certain equity conditions as set forth in the 2016 Notes. If the Company does not meet these equity conditions, then the cash will not become available to the Company. 2 of those equity conditions are that the Company shares of common stock have a dollar value of daily trading volume of at least $800,000 and a 5 day weighted average price of $31,200 (adjusted for the Company reverse stock splits) during certain equity condition measurement periods. The Company obtained a waiver on January 9, 2017, to these equity conditions which extended through February 28, 2017 and has now expired. As of March 17, 2017, the Company common stock closed at $0.001 per share and the dollar value of daily trading volume was $17,172 If the Company does not receive a new waiver or an amendment to the 2016 Notes which amends these equity conditions, then the Company will not be able to convert amortization payments under the 2016 Notes, which would require settlement of the payments in cash. Further, the Company would not meet the requirements to receive the release of the restrictions on cash in the restricted accounts. If the Company does not have sufficient cash to pay the amortization payments when due and payable under the 2016, then an Event of Default (as defined in the 2016 Notes) would occur and the holders of the 2016 Notes would be able to exercise their rights under the 2016 Notes, including but not limited to demanding immediate payment of the entire aggregate principal amount of the 2016 Notes and exercising rights under the security agreement over the Company assets. 28 Further, if the Company doesn t receive the release of restrictions on cash in the restricted accounts, then the Company likely would need to raise more capital to continue as a going concern. Any of the above events would substantially harm our financial position and could result in the Company declaring bankruptcy. Risk Related to Our Series F Preferred Stock Holders of our Series F Preferred Stock have certain additional rights upon the occurrence of certain triggering events which could harm our business, financial condition and results of operations and could require us to reduce or cease or operations. Under the Certificate of Designations for the Series F Preferred Stock, the holders will have certain rights upon a Triggering Event (as defined in the Certificate of Designations for the Series F Preferred Stock). Such rights include (i) the remaining principal amount of the Series F Preferred Stock bearing interest at a rate of 10% per annum, (ii) during the Triggering Event the conversion price being adjusted to the lowest of (a) the conversion price then in effect, (b) 75% of the lowest weighted average price of the our common stock during the 30 consecutive trading day period ending on the trading day immediately preceding the date of the Triggering Event conversion and (c) 75% of the weighted average price of the our common stock on the date of the applicable Triggering Event conversion, and (iii) the holder having the right to demand redemption of all or any number of the preferred shares. At any time after the earlier of the holder receipt of a notice of an Triggering Event and the holder becoming aware of an Triggering Event and ending on the 15th trading day after the later of (x) the date such Triggering Event is cured and (y) the holder receipt of an Triggering Event notice, the holder may require the Company to redeem all or any number of the preferred shares at a price equal to the greater of (x) 125% of the conversion amount being redeemed and (y) the product of (A) the conversion amount being redeemed and (B) the quotient determined by dividing (I) the greatest closing price of the shares of our common stock during the period beginning on the date immediately preceding such Triggering Event and ending on the date the holder delivers the redemption notice, by (II) the lowest conversion price in effect during such period. Triggering Event includes, but is not limited to (and subject to the ability to cure in certain instances) (i) (A) the suspension from trading for more than an aggregate of ten (10) trading days in any 365 day period or (B) the failure of the our common stock to be listed on an eligible market; (ii) the Company (i) failure to convert the Series F Preferred Shares or related warrants by delivery of the required number of shares of our common stock within five (5) trading days after the applicable conversion or exercise date, (ii) notice of its intention not to comply with a request for conversion or exercise of the Series F Preferred Stock or related warrants or (iii) the Company fails to have sufficient authorized shares to convert the Series F Preferred Stock and related warrants in full for 75 consecutive days. (iii) any payment failure; (iv) any default under, redemption of or acceleration prior to maturity of more than $100,000, individually or in the aggregate, of Indebtedness of the Company or any of its subsidiaries; (v) certain bankruptcy events; (vii) a final judgment or judgments for the payment of m1y aggregating in excess of $250,000, individually or in the aggregate, are rendered against the Company or any of its subsidiaries and which judgments are not, within sixty (60) days after the entry thereof, bonded, discharged or stayed pending appeal, or are not discharged within seventy five (75) days after the expiration of such stay; provided, however, that any judgment which is covered by insurance or an indemnity from a credit worthy party shall not be included in calculating the $250,000 amount set forth above so long as the Company provides each holder a written statement from such insurer or indemnity provider (which written statement shall be reasonably satisfactory to such holder) to the effect that such judgment is covered by insurance or an indemnity and the Company will receive the proceeds of such insurance or indemnity within forty five (45) days of the issuance of such judgment; (viii) breaches of representations, warranties and covenants in the Certificate of Designations for the Series F Preferred Stock and related transaction documents; or (ix) the Company failure for any reason after the date that is six (6) months immediately following the issuance date to satisfy the current public information requirement under Rule 144(c) of the Securities Act. The triggering and exercise of any of these rights could substantially harm our financial condition and force us to reduce or cease operations. Holders of our Series F Preferred Stock have voting rights on an as converted basis. These rights permit the holders of the Series F Preferred Stock to vote up to certain percentage of our outstanding voting securities. 29 The holders of the Series F Preferred Stock may have interests in matters brought before the shareholders that are different than holders of common stock. The holders of Series F Preferred Stock have the right to vote with holders of shares of our common stock, voting together as 1 class on all matters, with each share of Series F Preferred share entitling the holder thereof to cast that number of votes per share as is equal to the aggregate number of stock of our common stock into which it is then convertible (without regard to any limitations on conversion set forth in the Certificate of Designations for the Series F Preferred Stock including without limitation, the maximum percentage and or the failure to have a sufficient number of shares of common stock reserved or available for issuance pursuant to the Certificate of Designations for the Series F Preferred Stock) using the record date for determining the stockholders of the Company eligible to vote on such matters as the date as of which the conversion price is calculated; provided, that no holder (together with such holder attribution parties) shall be permitted to have a number of votes in excess of such aggregate number of votes granted to the holders of 9.99% of the shares our common stock then outstanding (including any votes with respect to any shares of our common stock and preferred stock beneficially owned by the holder or such holder attribution parties). The holders of the Series F Preferred Stock may have interests in matters brought before the stockholders that are different than the interests of holders of our common stock. Specifically, the holders of our Series F Preferred Stock are also holders of our 2016 Notes and their interests in relation to stockholder matters that affect the 2016 Notes will be different than the interests of holders of our common stock. While the Series F Preferred Stock holders do not act as a group, in the instances where their interests are aligned, their ability to cast votes on an as converted basis may affect the outcome of any stockholder votes on such matters. Risks Related to Owning our Common Stock and Other Securities The price of our common stock may fluctuate substantially. The market price of our common stock has been and may continue to be subject to wide fluctuation in response to various factors, some of which are beyond our control. Some factors that may cause the market price of our common stock to fluctuate, in addition to the other risks menti1d in this Risk Factors section and elsewhere in this report, are sales of our common stock by our stockholders, executives, and directors; conversions of the 2016 Notes into shares of common stock and subsequent sales of such shares by such holders; volatility and limitations in trading volumes of our shares of common stock or units; fluctuations in our results of operations; our ability to enter new markets; actual or unanticipated fluctuations in our annual and quarterly financial results; our ability to obtain financings to continue and expand our commercial activities, expand our manufacturing operations, conduct and complete research and development activities including, but not limited to, our human clinical trials, and other business activities; our ability to secure resources and the necessary personnel to continue and expand our commercial activities, develop additional assays, conduct clinical trials and gain approval for our additional assays on our desired schedule; commencement, enrollment or results of our clinical trials of our assays or any future clinical trials we may conduct; changes in the development status of our assays; any delays or adverse developments or perceived adverse developments with respect to the FDA review of our planned clinical trials; 30 any delay in our submission for studies or test approvals or adverse regulatory decisions, including failure to receive regulatory approval for our assays; our announcements or our competitors announcements regarding new assays, enhancements, significant contracts, acquisitions or strategic investments; unanticipated safety concerns related to our assays; failures to meet external expectations or management guidance; changes in our capital structure or dividend policy, including as a result of future issuances of securities and sales of large blocks of common stock by our stockholders; our cash position; announcements and events surrounding financing efforts, including debt and equity securities; our inability to enter into new markets or develop new assays; reputational issues; competition from existing technologies and assays or new technologies and assays that may emerge; announcements of acquisitions, partnerships, collaborations, joint ventures, new assays, capital commitments, or other events by us or our competitors; changes in general economic, political and market conditions in any of the regions in which we conduct our business; changes in industry conditions or perceptions; changes in valuations of similar companies or groups of companies; analyst research reports, recommendations and changes in recommendations, price targets and withdrawals of coverage; departures and additions of key personnel; disputes and litigations related to intellectual properties, proprietary rights and contractual obligations; changes in applicable laws, rules, regulations, or accounting practices and other dynamics; announcements or actions taken by our principal stockholders; and other events or factors, many of which may be out of our control. In addition, if any of the market for stocks in our industry or industries related to our industry, or the stock market in general, experiences a loss of investor confidence, the trading price of our common stock could decline for reasons unrelated to our business, financial condition and results of operations. If any of the foregoing occurs, it could cause our stock price to fall and may expose us to lawsuits that, even if unsuccessful, could be costly to defend and a distraction to management. Certain of our outstanding warrants and convertible securities have anti dilution provisions triggered by the issuance of shares of common stock and securities exercisable for shares of our common stock at prices below the then current exercise prices for such warrants, pursuant to which the exercise price of such warrants or conversion price of such convertible securities will be adjusted downward and could make it more likely that such warrants are exercised or such convertible securities are converted and dilute our current stockholders. The exercise price for each of the Class A Warrants, Class B Warrants, Series D Warrants, Series G Warrants, Series H Warrants, certain other warrants, 2015 Subordination Warrants and 2016 Subordination Warrants and the conversion price of the Series F Preferred Stock and 2016 Notes is subject to adjustment in the event we issue common stock or securities convertible into common stock at a price lower than the then current exercise price or conversion price, as the case may be. The exercise price of the Series B Warrants is subject to adjustment in the 31 event we issue common stock or securities convertible into common stock at a price lower than the current market price. If we issue shares of common stock or securities exercisable or convertible for shares of common stock that trigger these provisions, then the exercise price for these warrants and conversion price for the 2016 Notes and the Series F Preferred Stock will be reduced according to their provisions, in most cases, to the per share price of the triggering transaction. A reduction in the exercise price of these warrants and other securities will make it more likely that they are exercised or converted resulting in further dilution to our then current stockholders. Broker dealers may be discouraged from effecting transactions in our shares of common stock because they are considered a penny stock and are subject to the penny stock rules. Our shares of common stock are currently considered a penny stock. The SEC has adopted Rule 15g 9 which generally defines penny stock to be any equity security that has a market price (as defined) less than $5.00 per share or an exercise price of less than $5.00 per share, subject to certain exceptions. The shares of common stock are covered by the penny stock rules, which impose additional sales practice requirements on broker dealers who sell to persons other than established customers and accredited investors. The term accredited investor refers generally to institutions with assets in excess of $5,000,000 or individuals with a net worth in excess of $1,000,000 or annual income exceeding $200,000 or $300,000 jointly with their spouse. The penny stock rules require a broker dealer, prior to a transaction in a penny stock not otherwise exempt from the rules, to deliver a standardized risk disclosure document in a form prepared by the SEC, which provides information about penny stocks and the nature and level of risks in the penny stock market. The broker dealer also must provide the customer with current bid and offer quotations for the penny stock, the compensation of the broker dealer and its salesperson in the transaction, and monthly account statements showing the market value of each penny stock held in the customer account. The bid and offer quotations, and the broker dealer and salesperson compensation information, must be given to the customer orally or in writing prior to effecting the transaction and must be given to the customer in writing before or with the customer confirmation. In addition, the penny stock rules require that prior to a transaction in a penny stock not otherwise exempt from these rules, the broker dealer must make a special written determination that the penny stock is a suitable investment for the purchaser and receive the purchaser written agreement to the transaction. These disclosure requirements may have the effect of reducing the level of trading activity in the secondary market for the shares of common stock. Consequently, these penny stock rules may affect the ability of broker dealers to trade in the shares of common stock. Future sales and issuances of our common stock or rights to purchase common stock could result in additional dilution of the percentage ownership of our stockholders and could cause our share price to fall. We expect that significant additional capital will be needed in the future to continue our planned operations, including expanding research and development, funding clinical trials, purchasing of capital equipment, hiring new personnel, commercializing our diagnostic tests, and continuing activities as an operating public company. To the extent we raise additional capital by issuing equity securities, our stockholders may experience substantial dilution. We may sell common stock, convertible securities or other equity securities in 1 or more transactions at prices and in a manner we determine from time to time. If we sell common stock, convertible securities or other equity securities in more than 1 transaction, investors may be materially diluted by subsequent sales. Such sales may also result in material dilution to our existing stockholders, and new investors could gain rights superior to our existing stockholders. We do not intend to pay cash dividends on our shares of common stock so any returns will be limited to the value of our shares. We currently anticipate that we will retain future earnings for the development, operation and expansion of our business and do not anticipate declaring or paying any cash dividends for the foreseeable future. Any return to stockholders will therefore be limited to the increase, if any, of our share price. We are an emerging growth company and will be able to avail ourselves of reduced disclosure requirements applicable to emerging growth companies, which could make our common stock less attractive to investors. 32 We are an emerging growth company, as defined in the Jumpstart Our Business Startups Act of 2012, or the JOBS Act, and we intend to take advantage of certain exemptions from various reporting requirements that are applicable to other public companies that are not emerging growth companies including not being required to comply with the auditor attestation requirements of Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes Oxley Act, reduced disclosure obligations regarding executive compensation in our periodic reports and proxy statements, and exemptions from the requirements of holding a nonbinding advisory vote on executive compensation and stockholder approval of any golden parachute payments not previously approved. Investors may find our common stock less attractive because we may rely on these exemptions. If some investors find our common stock less attractive as a result, there may be a less active trading market for our common stock and our stock price may be more volatile. We may take advantage of these reporting exemptions until we are no longer an emerging growth company. We will remain an emerging growth company until the earliest of (i) the last day of the fiscal year in which we have total annual gross revenues of $1 billion or more; (ii) the last day of our fiscal year following the fifth anniversary of the date of the completion of our IPO; (iii) the date on which we have issued more than $1 billion in nonconvertible debt during the previous 3 years; or (iv) the date on which we are deemed to be a large accelerated filer under the rules of the Securities and Exchange Commission. We have elected to use the extended transition periods for complying with new or revised accounting standards. We have elected to use the extended transition period provided in Section 7(a)(2)(B) of the Securities Act for complying with new or revised accounting standards that have different effective dates for public and private companies until the earlier of the date we (i) are no longer an emerging growth company or (ii) affirmatively and irrevocably opt out of the extended transaction period provided in Section 7(a)(2)(B). As a result, our financial statements may not be comparable to those of companies that comply with public company effective dates. Our management is required to devote substantial time to compliance initiatives. As a public company, we incur significant legal, accounting and other expenses that we did not incur as a newly formed entity. The Sarbanes Oxley Act, as well as rules subsequently implemented by the Securities and Exchange Commission, have imposed various new requirements on public companies, including requiring establishment and maintenance of effective disclosure and financial controls and changes in corporate governance practices. Our management and other personnel devote a substantial amount of time to these new compliance initiatives. Moreover, these rules and regulations increase our legal and financial compliance costs and make some activities more time consuming and costly. We expect these rules and regulations to make it more difficult and more expensive for us to obtain director and officer liability insurance and we may be required to incur substantial costs to maintain the same or similar coverage. Provisions of our Seventh Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation, as amended, our Amended and Restated Bylaws and Delaware law could make an acquisition of our Company, which may be beneficial to our stockholders, more difficult and may prevent attempts by our stockholders to replace or remove the current members of our board of directors and management. Certain provisions of our Seventh Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation, as amended, or our Certificate, and our Amended and Restated Bylaws (our Bylaws ), could discourage, delay or prevent a merger, acquisition or other change of control that stockholders may consider favorable, including transactions in which stockholders might otherwise receive a premium for their shares. Furthermore, these provisions could prevent or frustrate attempts by our stockholders to replace or remove members of our board of directors. These provisions also could limit the price that investors might be willing to pay in the future for our common stock, thereby depressing the market price of our common stock. Stockholders who wish to participate in these transactions may not have the opportunity to do so. These provisions establish a classified board of directors, such that not all members of the board of directors may be elected at 1 time; 33 authorize our board of directors to issue without stockholder approval up to 5,000,000 shares of preferred stock, the rights of which will be determined at the discretion of the board of directors that, if issued, could operate as a poison pill to dilute the stock ownership of a potential hostile acquirer to prevent an acquisition that is not approved by our board of directors; require that stockholder actions must be effected at a duly called stockholder meeting or by written consent of the stockholders if such action has been earlier approved by the board of directors; establish advance notice requirements for stockholder nominations to our board of directors or for stockholder proposals that can be acted on at stockholder meetings; limit who may call stockholder meetings; and require the approval of the holders of at least sixty percent of the outstanding shares of our capital stock entitled to vote in order to amend certain provisions of our Certificate and at least 2 thirds of the outstanding voting stock to amend certain provisions of our Bylaws. In addition, we are governed by the provisions of Section 203 of the Delaware General Corporation Law, which may, unless certain criteria are met, prohibit large stockholders, in particular those owning 15% or more of the voting rights on our common stock, from merging or combining with us for a prescribed period of time. Risks Related to Our Business and Industry We have a limited commercial history upon which to base our prospects, have not generated profits and do not expect to generate profits for the foreseeable future. We may never achieve or sustain profitability. We began operations in January 2005, and we have a limited operating history. We have not earned significant revenue to date, and do not expect to earn significant revenue in the near future. We had a net loss for the years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015 of approximately $89.1 million and $57.9 million, respectively. As of December 31, 2016, we had an accumulated deficit of $2111 million. Investors should be aware of the difficulties normally encountered by a new enterprise, many of which are beyond our control, including substantial risks and expenses in the course of developing new diagnostic tests, establishing or entering new markets, organizing operations and marketing procedures. The likelihood of our success must be considered in light of these risks, expenses, complications and delays, and the competitive environment in which we operate. There is, therefore, nothing at this time upon which to base an assumption that our business plan will prove successful, and we may not be able to generate significant revenue, raise additional capital or operate profitably. We will continue to encounter risks and difficulties frequently experienced by early commercial stage companies, including scaling up our infrastructure and headcount, and may encounter unforeseen expenses, difficulties or delays in connection with our growth. In addition, as a result of the start up nature of our business, we can be expected to continue to sustain substantial operating expenses without generating sufficient revenues to cover expenditures. As discussed in Note 3 to the audited financial statements, our recurring operating losses from operations and our need for additional sources of capital to fund our ongoing operations raise substantial doubt about our ability to continue as a going concern. Any investment in our Company is therefore highly speculative and could result in the loss of your entire investment. Our near term success is dependent upon our ability to expand our customer base. Our current customer base is composed of hospitals and testing laboratories that use our C. diff , Group B Strep and other assays. Our success will depend, in part, upon our ability to expand our customer base and increase revenue by adding new products. Attracting new customers requires substantial time and expense. Any failure to expand our existing customer base would adversely affect our operating results. Many factors could affect the market acceptance and commercial success of our assays, including our ability to convince our potential customers of the advantages and economic value of our analyzers and assays over competing technologies and diagnostic assays; the breadth of our assay menu relative to competitors; changes to policies, procedures or currently accepted best practices in clinical diagnostics; 34 the extent and success of our marketing and sales efforts; our ability to manufacture analyzers for use by potential customers during the sales evaluation phase; and our ability to manufacture our commercial diagnostic cartridges and meet demand in a timely fashion. If we cannot successfully develop, maintain, commercialize, or obtain regulatory approvals for new and existing diagnostic assays, our financial results will be harmed and our ability to compete will be harmed. Our financial performance depends in part upon our ability to successfully develop and market new assays in a rapidly changing technological and economic environment, and to maintain and successfully commercialize previously cleared assays. If we fail to successfully introduce new assays or do not maintain approval for previously FDA cleared assays, we could lose customers and market share. We could also lose market share if our competitors introduce new assays or technologies that render our assays less competitive or obsolete. In addition, delays in the introduction of new assays due to regulatory, developmental or other obstacles could negatively impact our revenue and market share, as well as our earnings. Factors that can influence our ability to introduce new assays, the timing associated with new product approvals and commercial success of these assays include the scope of and progress made in our research and development activities; our ability to successfully initiate and complete clinical trial studies; timely expansion of our menu of assays; the results of clinical trials needed to support any regulatory approvals of our assays; our ability to obtain and maintain requisite FDA or other regulatory clearances or approvals for our assays on a timely basis; demand for the new assays we introduce; product offerings from our competitors; and the functionality of new assays that address market requirements and customer demands. We are subject to many laws and governmental regulations and any adverse regulatory action may materially adversely affect our financial condition and business operations. Our assays for C. diff , Group B Strep, Staph ID R and STEC and any assays that we develop and commercialize in the future are subject to regulation by numerous government agencies, including the FDA and comparable foreign agencies. To varying degrees, each of these agencies requires us to comply with laws and regulations governing the development, testing, manufacturing, labeling, marketing and distribution of our assays. In particular, FDA regulations govern activities such as product development, product testing, product labeling, product storage, premarket clearance or approval, manufacturing, advertising, promotion, product sales, reporting of certain product failures and distribution. Our assays will require 510(k) clearance from the FDA prior to marketing. Clinical trials are required to support a 510(k) submission. We may be unable to obtain marketing clearance for our assays in development. If such approval is obtained, it may take a significant amount of time; require the expenditure of substantial resources; involve stringent clinical and pre clinical testing; involve modifications, repairs, or replacements of our assays; and or result in limitations on the proposed uses of our assays. Our facilities are subject to periodic inspection by the FDA and foreign regulatory agencies and conformance to the FDA Quality System Regulation (the QSR ) and current Good Manufacturing Practice requirements, as well as applicable foreign or international standards. The results of these inspections can include inspectional observations 35 regarding potential violations of the Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act (the FDCA ) and related laws, warning letters, restrictions on medical device sales and other forms of enforcement. Since 2009, the FDA has significantly increased its oversight of companies subject to its regulations, including medical device companies, by hiring new investigators and stepping up inspections of manufacturing facilities. The FDA has recently also significantly increased the number of warning letters issued to companies. If the FDA were to conclude that we are not in compliance with applicable laws or regulations, or that any of our medical devices are ineffective or pose an unreasonable health risk, the FDA could ban such medical devices, detain or seize adulterated or misbranded medical devices, order a recall, repair, replacement, or refund of such devices, refuse to grant pending pre market approval applications or require certificates of foreign governments for exports, and or require us to notify health professionals and others that the devices present unreasonable risks of substantial harm to the public health. The FDA may also impose operating restrictions on a company wide basis, enjoin and restrain certain violations of applicable law pertaining to medical devices and assess civil or criminal penalties against our officers, employees or us. The FDA may also recommend prosecution to the U.S. Department of Justice. Any adverse regulatory action, depending on its magnitude, may restrict us from effectively marketing and selling our diagnostic tests. Foreign governmental regulations have become increasingly stringent and more common, and we may become subject to more rigorous regulation by foreign governmental authorities in the future. Penalties for a company non compliance with foreign governmental regulation could be severe, including revocation or suspension of a company business license and criminal sanctions. Any domestic or foreign governmental law or regulation imposed in the future may have a material adverse effect on us. Our current and potential customers in the United States and elsewhere may also be subject, directly or indirectly, to applicable anti kickback, fraud and abuse, false claims, transparency, health information privacy and security and other healthcare laws and regulations, which could expose us to criminal sanctions, civil penalties, contractual damages, reputational harm, administrative burdens and diminished profits and future earnings. The life sciences industry is highly competitive and subject to rapid technological change. If our competitors and potential competitors develop superior assays and technologies, our competitive position and results of operations would suffer. We face intense competition from a number of companies that offer assays in our target markets, many of which have substantially greater financial resources and larger, more established marketing, sales and service operations than we do. The life sciences industry is characterized by rapid and continuous technological innovation. We may need to develop new technologies for our existing product and our assays to be competitive. 1 or more of our current or future competitors could render our existing products or assays under development obsolete or uneconomical by technological advances. We may also encounter other problems in the process of delivering new assays to the marketplace, such as problems related to FDA clearance or regulations, design, development or manufacturing of such assays, and as a result we may be unsuccessful in selling such assays. Our future success depends on our ability to compete effectively against current technologies, as well as to respond effectively to technological advances by developing and marketing assays that are competitive in the continually changing technological landscape. If our assays do not perform as expected or the reliability of the technology on which our assays are based is questi1d, we could experience delayed or reduced market acceptance of our assays, increased costs and damage to our reputation. Our success depends on the market confidence that we can provide reliable, high quality analyzers and diagnostic cartridges. We believe that customers in our target markets are likely to be particularly sensitive to product defects and errors. Our reputation and the public image of our assays or technologies may be impaired if our assays fail to perform as expected or our assays are perceived as difficult to use. Despite quality control testing, defects or errors could occur in our assays or technologies. 36 In the future, if our assays experience a material defect or error, this could result in loss or delay of revenues, delayed market acceptance, product recalls, damaged reputation, diversion of development resources, legal claims, increased insurance costs or increased service and warranty costs, any of which could harm our business. Such defects or errors could also prompt us to amend certain warning labels or narrow the scope of the use of our assays, either of which could hinder our success in the market. Even after any underlying concerns or problems are resolved, any widespread concerns regarding our technology or any manufacturing defects or performance errors in our assays could result in lost revenue, delayed market acceptance, damaged reputation, increased service and warranty costs and claims against us. If our international distributor relationships are not successful, our ability to market and sell our assays will be harmed and our financial performance will be adversely affected. Outside of the United States, we depend on relationships with distributors for the marketing and sales of our assays in various geographic regions, and we have a limited ability to influence their efforts. Relying on distributors for our sales and marketing could harm our business for various reasons, including agreements with distributors may terminate prematurely due to disagreements or may result in litigation between the partners; our distributors may not devote sufficient resources to the sale of our assays; our distributors may be unsuccessful in marketing our assays; and we may not be able to negotiate future distributor agreements on acceptable terms. If any of our products, or the malfunctioning of our products, causes or contributes to a death or a serious injury, we will be subject to medical device reporting regulations, which can result in voluntary corrective actions or agency enforcement actions. Under the FDA medical device reporting regulations, medical device manufacturers are required to report to the FDA information that a device has or may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury or has malfuncti1d in a way that would likely cause or contribute to death or serious injury if the malfunction of the device were to recur. If we fail to report these events to the FDA within the required timeframes, or at all, FDA could take enforcement action against us. Any such adverse event involving our assays could also result in future voluntary corrective actions, such as recalls or customer notifications, or agency action, such as inspection or enforcement action. Any corrective action, whether voluntary or involuntary, as well as defending ourselves in a lawsuit, will require the dedication of our time and capital, distract management from operating our business, and may harm our reputation and financial results. Our assays may in the future be subject to product recalls. A recall of our products, either voluntarily or at the direction of the FDA or another governmental authority, including a third country authority, or the discovery of serious safety issues with our products, could have a significant adverse impact on us. The FDA and similar foreign governmental authorities have the authority to require the recall of commercialized products in the event of material deficiencies or defects in design or manufacture. In the case of the FDA, the authority to require a recall must be based on an FDA finding that there is reasonable probability that the device would cause serious injury or death. In addition, foreign governmental bodies have the authority to require the recall of our products in the event of material deficiencies or defects in design or manufacture. Manufacturers may, under their own initiative, recall a product if any material deficiency in a device is found. The FDA requires that certain classifications of recalls be reported to the FDA within ten working days after the recall is initiated. A government mandated or voluntary recall by us or 1 of our international distributors could occur as a result of an unacceptable risk to health, comp1nt failures, malfunctions, manufacturing errors, design or labeling defects or other deficiencies and issues. Recalls of any of our assays would divert managerial and financial resources and have an adverse effect on our reputation, results of operations and financial condition, which could impair our ability to produce our products in a cost effective and timely manner in order to meet our customers demands. We may also be subject to liability claims, be required to bear other costs, or take other actions that may have a negative impact 37 on our future sales and our ability to generate profits. Companies are required to maintain certain records of recalls, even if they are not reportable to the FDA or another third country competent authority. We may initiate voluntary recalls involving our products in the future that we determine do not require notification of the FDA or another third country competent authority. If the FDA disagrees with our determinations, it could require us to report those actions as recalls. A future recall announcement could harm our reputation with customers and negatively affect our sales. In addition, the FDA could take enforcement action for failing to report the recalls when they occur. We are also required to follow detailed recordkeeping requirements for all Company initiated medical device corrections and removals. In addition, in December 2012, the FDA issued a draft guidance intended to assist the FDA and industry in distinguishing medical device recalls from product enhancements. Per the guidance, if any change or group of changes to a device that addresses a violation of the FDCA, that change would generally constitute a medical device recall and require submission of a recall report to the FDA. If we become subject to claims relating to improper handling, storage or disposal of hazardous materials, we could incur significant cost and time to comply. Our research and development processes involve the controlled storage, use and disposal of hazardous materials, including biological hazardous materials. We are subject to foreign, federal, state and local regulations governing the use, manufacture, storage, handling and disposal of materials and waste products. We may incur significant costs complying with both existing and future environmental laws and regulations. In particular, we are subject to regulation by the Occupational Safety and Health Administration, or OSHA, and the Environmental Protection Agency, or EPA, and to regulation under the Toxic Substances Control Act and the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act in the United States. OSHA or the EPA may adopt additional regulations in the future that may affect our research and development programs. The risk of accidental contamination or injury from hazardous materials cannot be eliminated completely. In the event of an accident, we could be held liable for any damages that result, and any liability could exceed the limits or fall outside the coverage of our workers compensation insurance. We may not be able to maintain insurance on acceptable terms, if at all. Our diagnostic cartridges have not been manufactured on a high volume scale and are subject to unforeseen scale up risks. Although we have developed a process to manufacture diagnostic cartridges for our current volume of sales, there can be no assurance that we can manufacture our diagnostic cartridges at a scale that is adequate for our future commercial needs. We may face significant or unforeseen difficulties in manufacturing our diagnostic cartridges, including but not limited to technical issues relating to manufacturing comp1nts of our diagnostic cartridges on a high volume commercial scale at reasonable cost, and in a reasonable time frame; difficulty meeting demand or timing requirements for orders due to excessive costs or lack of capacity for part or all of an operation or process; lack of skilled labor or unexpected increases in labor costs needed to produce or maintain our analyzers or perform certain required operations; changes in government regulations or in quality or other requirements that lead to additional manufacturing costs or an inability to supply product in a timely manner, if at all; and increases in raw material or comp1nt supply cost or an inability to obtain supplies of certain critical supplies needed to complete our manufacturing processes. These and other difficulties may only become apparent when scaling up to the manufacturing process of our diagnostic cartridges to a more substantive commercial scale. If our diagnostic cartridges cannot be manufactured in sufficient commercial quantities or manufacturing is delayed, our future prospects could be significantly impacted and our financial prospects would be materially harmed. We or our suppliers may experience development or manufacturing problems or delays that could limit the growth of our revenue or increase our losses. 38 We may encounter unforeseen situations in the manufacturing of our diagnostic cartridges that could result in delays or shortfalls in our production. Our suppliers may also face similar delays or shortfalls. In addition, our or our suppliers production processes may have to change to accommodate any significant future expansion of our manufacturing capacity, which may increase our or our suppliers manufacturing costs, delay production of our diagnostic cartridges, reduce our product gross margin and adversely impact our business. If we are unable to satisfy demand for our diagnostic cartridges by successfully manufacturing and shipping our diagnostic cartridges in a timely manner, our revenue could be impaired, market acceptance for our assays could be adversely affected and our customers might instead purchase our competitors assays. In addition, developing manufacturing procedures for assays under development may require developing specific production processes for those assays. Developing such processes could be time consuming and any unexpected difficulty in doing so can delay the introduction of a product. We are dependent on single source suppliers for some of the comp1nts and materials used in our assays, and supply chain interruptions could negatively impact our operations and financial performance. Our assays are manufactured by us and we obtain supplies from a limited number of suppliers. In some cases, critical comp1nts required to manufacture our assays may only be available from a sole supplier or limited number of suppliers, any of whom would be difficult to replace. The supply of any of our manufacturing materials may be interrupted because of poor vendor performance or other events outside our control, which may require us, among other things, to identify alternate vendors and result in lost sales and increased expenses. Even if the manufacturing materials that we source are available from other parties, the time and effort involved in validating the new supplies and obtaining any necessary regulatory approvals for substitutes could impede our ability to replace such comp1nts in a timely manner or at all. We expect to rely on third parties to conduct studies of our assays under development that will be required by the FDA or other regulatory authorities and those third parties may not perform satisfactorily. We do not have the ability to independently conduct the field trial studies or other studies that may be required to obtain FDA and other regulatory clearances or approvals for our assays. Accordingly, we expect to rely on third parties, such as independent testing laboratories and hospitals, to conduct such studies. Our reliance on these third parties will reduce our control over these activities. These third party contractors may not complete activities on schedule or conduct studies in accordance with regulatory requirements or our study design. We cannot control whether they devote sufficient time, skill and resources to our studies. Our reliance on third parties that we do not control will not relieve us of any applicable requirement to prepare, and ensure compliance with, various procedures required under good clinical practices. If these third parties do not successfully carry out their contractual duties or regulatory obligations or meet expected deadlines, if the third parties need to be replaced or if the quality or accuracy of the data they obtain is compromised due to their failure to adhere to our clinical protocols or regulatory requirements or for other reasons, our studies may be extended, delayed, suspended or terminated, and we may not be able to obtain regulatory approval for additional assays. Any clinical trials that we may conduct may not begin on time, or at all, may not be completed on schedule, or at all, or may be more expensive than we expect, which could prevent or delay regulatory approval of our assays or impair our financial position. The commencement or completion of any clinical trials that we may conduct may be delayed or halted for numerous reasons, including, but not limited to, the following the FDA or other regulatory authorities suspend or place on hold a clinical trial, or do not approve a clinical trial protocol or a clinical trial; the data and safety monitoring committee or applicable hospital institutional ethics review board recommends that a trial be placed on hold or suspended; fewer patients meet our clinical study criteria and our enrollment rate is lower than we expected; 39 clinical trial sites decide not to participate or cease participation in a clinical trial; third party clinical investigators do not perform our clinical trials on schedule or consistent with the clinical trial protocol and good clinical practices, or other third party organizations do not perform data collection and analysis in a timely or accurate manner; we fail regulatory inspections of our manufacturing facilities requiring us to undertake corrective action or suspend or terminate our clinical trials; interim results of the clinical trial are inconclusive or negative; pre clinical or clinical data are interpreted by third parties in unanticipated ways; or our trial design is inadequate to demonstrate safety and or efficacy. Our clinical trial costs will increase if we have material delays in those trials or if we need to perform more or larger trials than planned. Adverse events during a clinical trial could cause us to repeat a trial, terminate a trial or cancel an entire program. Should our clinical development plan be delayed, this could have a material adverse effect on our operations and financial condition. Product liability claims could adversely impact our financial condition and our earnings and impair our reputation. Our business exposes us to potential product liability risks that are inherent in the design, manufacture and marketing of medical devices. Device failures, manufacturing defects, design flaws, or inadequate disclosure of product related risks or product related information with respect to our assays could result in an unsafe condition regarding, injury to, or death of, a patient. The occurrence of such a problem could result in product liability claims or a recall of, or safety alert relating to, 1 or more of our assays. Product liability claims or product recalls in the future, regardless of their ultimate outcome, could have a material adverse effect on our business and reputation and on our ability to attract and retain customers for our assays. Healthcare policy changes, including U.S. healthcare reform legislation signed in 2010, may have a material adverse effect on us. In March 2010, the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act and the Health Care and Education Affordability Reconciliation Act of 2010, or PPACA, were signed into law. The legislation imposes a 23% excise tax on medical device manufacturers. This significant tax burden on our industry could have a material, negative impact on our results of operations and our cash flows. Other elements of this legislation, such as comparative effectiveness research, an independent payment advisory board, payment system reforms, including shared savings pilots, and other provisions, could meaningfully change the way healthcare is developed and delivered, and may materially impact numerous aspects of our business. In addition, we expect that the new presidential administration and U.S. Congress will seek to modify, repeal, or otherwise invalidate all, or certain provisions of, the Affordable Care Act. Since taking office, President Trump has continued to support the repeal of all or portions of the Affordable Care Act. In January 2017, the House and Senate passed a budget resolution that authorizes congressional committees to draft legislation to repeal all or portions of the Affordable Care Act and permits such legislation to pass with a majority vote in the Senate. President Trump has also recently issued an executive order in which he stated that it is his administration policy to seek the prompt repeal of the Affordable Care Act and directed executive departments and federal agencies to waive, defer, grant exemptions from, or delay the implementation of the provisions of the Affordable Care Act to the maximum extent permitted by law. There is still uncertainty with respect to the impact President Trump administration and the U.S. Congress may have, if any, and any changes will likely take time to unfold, and could have an impact on coverage and reimbursement for healthcare Item and services covered by plans that were authorized by the Affordable Care Act. However, we cannot predict the ultimate content, timing or effect of any healthcare reform legislation or the impact of potential legislation on us. 40 Adverse changes in reimbursement policies and procedures by payors may impact our ability to market and sell our assays that are subject to reimbursement. Healthcare costs have risen significantly over the past decade, and there have been and continue to be proposals by legislators, regulators and third party payors to decrease costs. Third party payors are increasingly challenging the prices charged for medical products and services and instituting cost containment measures to control or significantly influence the purchase of medical products and services. For example, the PPACA, among other things, reduced and or limited Medicare reimbursement to certain providers. The Budget Control Act of 2011, as amended by subsequent legislation, further reduces Medicare payments to providers by 2 percent through fiscal year 2024. These reductions may reduce providers revenues or profits, which could affect their ability to purchase new technologies. Furthermore, the healthcare industry in the United States has experienced a trend toward cost containment as government and private insurers seek to control healthcare costs by imposing lower payment rates and negotiating reduced contract rates with service providers. Legislation could be adopted in the future that limits payments for our products from governmental payors. In addition, commercial payors such as insurance companies, could adopt similar policies that limit reimbursement for medical device manufacturers products. Therefore, we cannot be certain that those of our assays that will be subject to reimbursement will be reimbursed at a cost effective level. We face similar risks relating to adverse changes in reimbursement procedures and policies in other countries where we market or intend to market our assays. Reimbursement and healthcare payment systems vary significantly among international markets. Our inability to obtain international reimbursement approval, or any adverse changes in the reimbursement policies of foreign payors, could negatively affect our ability to sell our assays and have a material adverse effect on our business and financial condition. Consolidation in the healthcare industry could have an adverse effect on our revenues and results of operations. Many healthcare industry companies, including healthcare systems, are consolidating to create new companies with greater market power. As the healthcare industry consolidates, competition to provide goods and services to industry participants will become more intense. These industry participants may try to use their market power to negotiate price concessions or reductions for diagnostic tests. If we are forced to reduce our prices because of consolidation in the healthcare industry, our projected revenues would decrease and our earnings, financial condition, and or cash flows would suffer. If we or our distributors do not comply with the U.S. federal and state fraud and abuse laws, including anti kickback laws for any products approved in the U.S., or with similar foreign laws where we market our products, we could face significant liability. There are numerous United States federal and state laws pertaining to healthcare fraud and abuse, including anti kickback laws, false claims, and physician transparency laws. Our relationships with physicians and surgeons, hospitals and our independent distributors are subject to scrutiny under these laws. Violations of these laws are punishable by criminal and civil sanctions, including significant fines, damages and m1tary penalties and in some instances, imprisonment and exclusion from participation in federal and state healthcare programs, including the Medicare, Medicaid and Veterans Administration health programs. Healthcare fraud and abuse regulations are complex, and even minor irregularities can potentially give rise to claims that a statute or prohibition has been violated. The laws that may affect our ability to operate include the federal healthcare program Anti Kickback Statute, which prohibits, among other things, persons from knowingly and willfully soliciting, offering, receiving, or paying remuneration, directly or indirectly, in cash or in kind, to induce or reward the purchasing, leasing, ordering or arranging for or recommending the purchase, lease or order of any good or service for which payment may be made under federal healthcare programs such as Medicare and Medicaid; 41 federal civil False Claims Act prohibits, among other things, knowingly presenting, or causing to be presented, claims for payment of government funds that are false or fraudulent or knowingly making, using or causing to be made or used a false record or statement material to an obligation to pay m1y to the government or knowingly concealing or knowingly and improperly avoiding, decreasing or concealing an obligation to pay m1y to the federal government; the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, or HIPAA, as amended by the Health Information Technology and Clinical Health Act of 2009, which, among other things, imposes criminal and civil liability for executing a scheme to defraud any healthcare benefit program and also imposes obligations, including mandatory contractual terms, with respect to safeguarding the privacy, security and transmission of individually identifiable health information; HIPAA also created federal criminal laws that prohibit knowingly and willfully falsifying, concealing or covering up a material fact or making any materially false, fictitious or fraudulent statement or representation, or making or using any false writing or document knowing the same to contain any materially false fictitious or fraudulent statement or entry in connection with the delivery of or payment for healthcare benefits, Item or services; the Federal Trade Commission Act and similar laws regulating advertisement and consumer protections; the federal Foreign Corrupt Practices Act of 1997, which makes it illegal to offer or provide m1y or anything of value to officials of foreign governments, foreign political parties, or international organizations with the intent to obtain or retain business or seek a business advantage; and state law equivalents of each of the above federal laws, such as anti kickback and false claims laws which may apply to Item or services reimbursed by any third party payor, including commercial insurers, and state laws governing the privacy of health information in certain circumstances, many of which differ from each other in significant ways and often are not preempted by HIPAA, thus complicating compliance efforts. In addition, there has been a recent trend of increased federal and state regulation of payments made to physicians. Some states, such as California, Massachusetts, Nevada, and Vermont mandate implementation of commercial compliance programs and or impose restrictions on device manufacturer marketing practices and tracking and reporting of gifts, compensation and other remuneration to physicians. Efforts to ensure that our business arrangements with third parties will comply with applicable healthcare laws and regulations will involve substantial costs. It is possible that governmental authorities will conclude that our business practices may not comply with current or future statutes, regulations or case law involving applicable fraud and abuse or other healthcare laws and regulations. If our operations are found to be in violation of any of these laws or any other governmental regulations that may apply to us, we may be subject to significant civil, criminal and administrative penalties, damages, fines, exclusion from federal healthcare programs, such as Medicare and Medicaid, and the curtailment or restructuring of our operations. To enforce compliance with the federal laws, the U.S. Department of Justice, or DOJ, has recently increased its scrutiny of interactions between healthcare companies and healthcare providers, which has led to a number of investigations, prosecutions, convictions and settlements in the healthcare industry. Dealing with investigations can be time and resource consuming and can divert management attention from the business. In addition, settlements with the DOJ or other law enforcement agencies have forced healthcare providers to agree to additional 1rous compliance and reporting requirements as part of a consent decree or corporate integrity agreement. Any violations of these laws, or any action against us for violation of these laws, even if we successfully defend against it, could have a material adverse effect on our reputation, business and financial condition. Many foreign countries have enacted similar laws addressing fraud and abuse in the healthcare sector. The shifting commercial compliance environment and the need to build and maintain robust and expandable systems to comply with different compliance requirements in multiple jurisdictions increases the possibility that we may run afoul of 1 or more of the requirements. The implementation of the reporting and disclosure obligations of the Physician Payments Sunshine Act Open Payments provisions of the Health Care Reform Law could adversely affect our business upon commercialization of our product in the U.S. The federal Physician Payments Sunshine Act, being implemented as the Open Payments Program, requires device manufacturers to engage in extensive tracking of payments and other transfers of value made to physicians and teaching hospitals, as well as physician ownership and investment interests, and public reporting of such data to the 42 Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services annually. Although we have and expect to continue to have substantially compliant programs and controls in place to comply with the Physician Payments Sunshine Act requirements and similar state and foreign laws, our compliance with the Physician Payments Sunshine Act and similar state and foreign transparency laws imposes additional costs on us. Additionally, failure to comply with the Physician Payment Sunshine Act or similar state or foreign laws may subject us to m1tary penalties. Our ability to compete depends on our ability to attract and retain talented employees. Our future success depends on our ability to identify, attract, train, integrate and retain highly qualified technical, development, sales and marketing, managerial and administrative personnel. Competition for highly skilled individuals is extremely intense and we face difficulty identifying and hiring qualified personnel in many areas of our business. We may not be able to hire and retain such personnel at compensation levels consistent with our existing compensation and salary structure. Many of the companies with which we compete for hiring experienced employees have greater resources than we have. If we fail to identify, attract, train, integrate and retain highly qualified and motivated personnel, our reputation could suffer and our business, financial condition and results of operations could be adversely affected. Our future success also depends on the continued service and performance of our senior management team. The replacement of members of our senior management team likely would involve significant time and costs, and the loss of any these individuals may delay or prevent the achievement of our business objectives. Changes in tax laws or exposure to additional income tax liabilities could have a material impact on our financial condition and results of operations. We are subject to income taxes as well as non income based taxes in both the United States and various foreign jurisdictions. Changes in existing tax laws, treaties, regulations or policies or the interpretation or enforcement thereof, or the enactment or adoption of new tax laws, treaties, regulations or policies could materially impact our effective tax rate. If we do not achieve, sustain or successfully manage our anticipated growth, our business and prospects will be harmed. If we are unable to obtain or sustain adequate revenue growth, our financial results could suffer. Furthermore, significant growth will place strains on our management and our operational and financial systems and processes and our operating costs may escalate even faster than planned. If we cannot effectively manage our expanding operations and our costs, we may not be able to grow effectively or we may grow at a slower pace. Additionally, if we do not successfully forecast the timing of regulatory authorization for our additional tests, marketing and subsequent demand for our diagnostic tests or manage our anticipated expenses accordingly, our operating results will be harmed. Other companies or institutions have commercial assays or may develop and market novel or improved methods for infectious disease diagnostics, which may make our diagnostic platform less competitive or obsolete. The market for diagnostics is large and established, and our competitors may possess significantly greater financial resources and have larger development and commercialization capabilities than we do. We may be unable to compete effectively against these competitors either because their diagnostic platforms are superior or because they may have more expertise, experience, financial resources or stronger business relationships. Demand for our assays depends in part on the operating budgets and hospital acquired infection rates of our customers, a reduction in which could limit demand for our assays and adversely affect our business. In the near term, we expect that our revenue will be derived primarily from sales of our C. diff , Group B Strep, Staph ID R and STEC diagnostic assays to hospitals. The demand for our assays will depend in part upon the prevalence 43 of C. diff and Group B Strep at the hospitals of these customers and impacted by other factors beyond our control, such as global macroeconomic conditions; total bed days; changes in the regulatory environment; differences in budgetary cycles; market driven pressures to consolidate operations and reduce costs; and market acceptance of new technologies. Our operating results may fluctuate due to reductions and delays in expenditures by our customers. Any decrease in our customers budgets or expenditures, or in the size, scope or frequency of operating expenditures, could materially and adversely affect our business, operating results and financial condition. New technologies, techniques or assays could emerge that might offer better combinations of price and performance than our current C. diff, Group B Strep, Staph ID R and e. coli assays or future assays and analyzers. It is critical to our success that we anticipate changes in technology and customer requirements and to successfully introduce, on a timely and cost effective basis, new, enhanced and competitive technologies that meet the needs of current and prospective customers. If we do not successfully innovate and introduce new technology into our product lines or manage the transitions to new product offerings, our revenues, results of operations and business will be adversely impacted. Competitors may be able to respond more quickly and effectively than we can to new or changing opportunities, technologies, standards or customer requirements. We anticipate that we will face increased competition in the future as existing companies and competitors develop new or improved diagnostic tests and as new companies enter the market with new technologies. Due to our fixed overhead costs and the depreciation of our analyzers at customer sites included in cost of sales and the costs associated with our current hand build cartridge manufacturing process we have in the past experienced substantial negative gross margins. We will need to increase our sales volumes significantly and automate our cartridge manufacturing process in order to achieve profitability. We had negative gross margins of 164.5% and 124.7% during the years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015, respectively. The comp1nts of our cost of sales include cost of materials, supplies, labor for manufacturing, equipment and facility expenses associated with manufacturing. Facility expenses include allocated overhead comprised of rent, equipment depreciation and utilities. Due to our fixed overhead costs we will continue to experience negative gross margins unless and until we are able to significantly increase our sales volume. In addition, we currently hand build our diagnostic cartridges. We are working to automate portions of our manufacturing and assembly process, which we believe will reduce our cartridge manufacturing costs. However, there is no assurance that we will be successful in automating our manufacturing process, and our failure to do so will materially limit our ability to reduce our cost of sales in the future. If we experience a significant disruption in our information technology systems or if we fail to implement new systems and software successfully, our business could be adversely affected. We depend on information systems to manufacture products, process orders, manage inventory, process shipments to customers and respond to customer inquiries. If we were to experience a prolonged disruption in the information technology systems that involve our interactions with customers and suppliers, it could result in the loss of sales and customers, which could adversely affect our business. 44 Risks Related to Intellectual Property The extent to which we can protect our business and technologies through intellectual property rights that we own, acquire or license is uncertain. We employ a variety of proprietary and patented technologies and methods in connection with the assays that we sell or are developing. We license some of these technologies from third parties. We cannot provide any assurance that the intellectual property rights that we own or license provide effective protection from competitive threats or that we would prevail in any litigation in which our intellectual property rights are challenged. In addition, we may not be successful in obtaining new proprietary or patented technologies or methods in the future, whether through acquiring ownership or through licenses from third parties. Our currently pending or future patent applications may not result in issued patents, and we cannot predict how long it may take for a patent to issue on any of our pending patent applications, assuming a patent does issue. Other parties may challenge patents issued or exclusively licensed to us, or courts or administrative agencies may hold our patents or the patents we license on an exclusive basis to be invalid or unenforceable. We may not be successful in defending challenges made against our patents and other intellectual property rights. Any third party challenge to any of our patents could result in the unenforceability or invalidity of some or all of the claims of such patents and could be time consuming and expensive. The extent to which the patent rights of life sciences companies effectively protect their diagnostic tests and technologies is often highly uncertain and involves complex legal and factual questions for which important legal principles remain unresolved. No consistent policy regarding the proper scope of allowable claims of patents held by life sciences companies has emerged to date in the United States. Various courts, including the U.S. Supreme Court, have rendered decisions that impact the scope of patentability of certain inventions or discoveries relating to diagnostic tests or genomic diagnostic testing. These decisions generally stand for the proposition that inventions that recite laws of nature are not themselves patentable unless they have sufficient additional features that provide practical assurance that the processes are genuine inventive applications of those laws rather than patent drafting efforts designed to monopolize a law of nature itself. What constitutes a sufficient additional feature for this purpose is uncertain. Although we do not generally rely on gene sequence patents, this evolving case law in the United States may adversely impact our ability to obtain new patents and may facilitate third party challenges to our existing owned and exclusively licensed patents. We cannot predict the breadth of claims that may be allowed or enforced in patents we own or in those to which we have exclusive license rights. For example the inventor(s) named in 1 or more of our patents or patent applications might not have been the first to have made the relevant invention; the inventor (or his assignee) might not have been the first to file a patent application for the claimed invention; others may independently develop similar or alternative diagnostic tests and technologies or may successfully replicate our product and technologies; it is possible that the patents we own or in which have exclusive license rights may not provide us with any competitive advantages or may be challenged by third parties and found to be invalid or unenforceable; any patents we obtain or exclusively license may expire before, or within a limited time period after, the assays and services relating to such patents are commercialized; we may not develop or acquire additional proprietary assays and technologies that are patentable; and 45 others may acquire patents that could be asserted against us in a manner that could have an adverse effect on our business. Changes in either the patent laws or in interpretations of patent laws in the United States or other countries may diminish the value of our intellectual property rights. On September 16, 2011, the Leahy Smith America Invents Act, or the Leahy Smith Act, was signed into law. The Leahy Smith Act includes a number of significant changes to U.S. patent law. These include provisions that affect the way patent applications are prosecuted, redefine prior art, may affect patent litigation and switch the U.S. patent system from a first to invent system to a first to file system. Under a first to file system, assuming the other requirements for patentability are met, the first inventor to file a patent application generally will be entitled to the patent on an invention regardless of whether another inventor had made the invention earlier. The U.S. Patent and Trademark Office, or USPTO, recently developed new regulations and procedures to govern administration of the Leahy Smith Act, and many of the substantive changes to patent law associated with the Leahy Smith Act, including the first to file provisions in particular, only became effective on March 16, 2013 Accordingly, it is not clear what, if any, impact the Leahy Smith Act will have on the operation of our business. However, the Leahy Smith Act and its implementation could increase the uncertainties and costs surrounding the prosecution of our owned and licensed patent applications and the enforcement or defense of issued patents that we own or license, all of which could have a material adverse effect on our business and financial condition. Patent applications in the United States and many foreign jurisdictions are not published until at least eighteen months after filing and it is possible for a patent application filed in the United States to be maintained in secrecy until a patent issues on the application. In addition, publications in the scientific literature often lag behind actual discoveries. We therefore cannot be certain that others have not filed patent applications that cover inventions that are the subject of pending applications that we own or exclusively license or that we were the first to invent the technology (if filed prior to the Leahy Smith Act) or first to file (if filed after the Leahy Smith Act). Our competitors may have filed, and may in the future file, patent applications covering technology that is similar to or the same as our technology. Any such patent application may have priority over patent applications that we own and, if a patent issues on such patent application, we could be required to obtain a license to such patent in order to carry on our business. If another party has filed a U.S. patent application covering an invention that is similar to, or the same as, an invention that we own, we may have to participate in an interference or other proceeding in the USPTO or a court to determine priority of invention in the United States, for applications and patents made prior to the enactment of the Leahy Smith Act. For applications and patents made following the enactment of the Leahy Smith Act, we may have to participate in a derivation proceeding to resolve disputes relating to inventorship. The costs of these proceedings could be substantial, and it is possible that such efforts would be unsuccessful, resulting in our inability to obtain or retain any U.S. patent rights with respect to such invention. In addition, the laws of foreign jurisdictions may not protect our rights to the same extent as the laws of the United States. For example, European patent law restricts the patentability of methods of treatment of the human body more than U.S. law does. Publications of discoveries in scientific literature often lag behind the actual discoveries, and patent applications in the United States and other jurisdictions are typically not published until 18 months after filing, or in some cases not at all. Therefore, we cannot be certain that we were the first to make the inventions claimed in our owned or licensed patents or pending patent applications, or that we or our licensors were the first to file for patent protection of such inventions. Moreover, the USPTO might require that the term of a patent issuing from a pending patent application be disclaimed and limited to the term of another patent that is commonly owned or names a common inventor. As a result, the issuance, scope, validity, term, enforceability and commercial value of our patent rights are highly uncertain. The patent prosecution process is expensive and time consuming, is highly uncertain and involves complex legal and factual questions. Recent patent reform legislation could increase the uncertainties and costs surrounding the prosecution of our patent applications and the enforcement or defense of our issued patents. Our success depends in large part on our ability to obtain and maintain patent protection in the United States and other countries with respect to our proprietary technology and product candidates. We seek to protect our proprietary 46 position by filing in the United States and in certain foreign jurisdictions patent applications related to our novel technologies and product candidates that are important to our business. The patent prosecution process is expensive and time consuming, and we may not be able to file and prosecute all necessary or desirable patent applications at a reasonable cost or in a timely manner. It is also possible that we will fail to identify patentable aspects of our research and development output before it is too late to obtain patent protection. In addition, we may not pursue or obtain patent protection in all major markets. Moreover, in some circumstances, we may not have the right to control the preparation, filing or prosecution of patent applications, or to maintain the patents, covering technology that we license from third parties. In some circumstances, our licensors may have the right to enforce the licensed patents without our involvement or consent, or to decide not to enforce or to allow us to enforce the licensed patents. Therefore, these patents and patent applications may not be prosecuted and enforced in a manner consistent with the best interests of our business. If any of our licensors fail to maintain such patents, or lose rights to those patents, the rights that we have licensed may be reduced or eliminated and our right to develop and commercialize any of our product candidates that are the subject of such licensed rights could be adversely affected. Our pending and future patent applications may not result in patents being issued which protect our technology or products, in whole or in part, or which effectively prevent others from commercializing competitive technologies and products. In particular, during prosecution of any patent application, the issuance of any patents based on the application may depend upon our ability to generate additional nonclinical or clinical data that support the patentability of our proposed claims. We may not be able to generate sufficient additional data on a timely basis, or at all. Moreover, changes in either the patent laws or interpretation of the patent laws in the United States or other countries may diminish the value of our patents or narrow the scope of our patent protection. Moreover, we may be subject to a third party pre issuance submission of prior art to the USPTO, or become involved in opposition, derivation, reexamination, inter partes review, post grant review or interference proceedings or other patent office proceedings or litigation, in the United States or elsewhere, challenging our patent rights or the patent rights of others. An adverse determination in any such submission or proceeding could reduce the scope of, or invalidate, our patent rights; allow third parties to commercialize our technology or products and compete directly with us, without payment to us; or result in our inability to manufacture or commercialize products without infringing third party patent rights. In addition, if the breadth or strength of protection provided by our owned and licensed patents and patent applications is threatened, it could dissuade companies from collaborating with us to license, develop or commercialize current or future product candidates. Obtaining and maintaining our patent protection depends upon compliance with various procedural, document submission, fee payment and other requirements imposed by governmental patent agencies, and our patent protection could be reduced or eliminated for non compliance with these requirements. The USPTO and various foreign governmental patent agencies require compliance with a number of procedural, documentary, fee payment and other provisions during the patent prosecution process and following the issuance of a patent. There are situations in which noncompliance with these requirements can result in abandonment or lapse of a patent or patent application, resulting in partial or complete loss of patent rights in the relevant jurisdiction. In such an event, competitors might be able to enter the market earlier than would otherwise have been the case if our patent were in force. Our intellectual property rights may not be sufficient to protect our competitive position and to prevent others from manufacturing, using or selling competing assays. The scope of our owned and exclusively licensed intellectual property rights may not be sufficient to prevent others from manufacturing, using or selling competing assays. Competitors could purchase our product and attempt to replicate some or all of the competitive advantages we derive from our development efforts, willfully infringe our intellectual property rights, design around our protected technology or develop their own competitive technologies and thereby avoid infringing our intellectual property rights. If our intellectual property is not sufficient to 47 effectively prevent our competitors from developing and selling similar diagnostic tests, our competitive position and our business could be adversely affected. Our platform depends on certain technologies that are licensed to us. We do not control these technologies and any loss of our rights to them could prevent us from manufacturing our assays. We rely on licenses to various proprietary technologies that are material to our business, including the development of certain future assays. We have entered into non exclusive licenses with Biohelix Corp., or Biohelix, a subsidiary of Quidel Corporation and a license with Integrated DNA Technologies, Inc. that has certain exclusive and non exclusive fields. Our rights to use these technologies will be subject to the continuation of and our compliance with the terms of those licenses. We may become involved in disputes relating to our intellectual property rights, and may need to resort to litigation in order to defend and enforce our intellectual property rights. Extensive litigation regarding patents and other intellectual property rights has been common in the medical diagnostic testing industry. Litigation may be necessary to assert infringement claims, protect trade secrets or know how and determine the enforceability, scope and validity of certain proprietary rights. Litigation may even be necessary to resolve disputes of inventorship or ownership of proprietary rights. The defense and prosecution of intellectual property lawsuits, USPTO interference or derivation proceedings and related legal and administrative proceedings ( e.g ., a re examination) in the United States and internationally involve complex legal and factual questions. As a result, such proceedings are costly and time consuming to pursue, and their outcome is uncertain. Even if we prevail in such a proceeding in which we assert our intellectual property rights against third parties, the remedy we obtain may not be commercially meaningful or adequately compensate us for any damages we may have suffered. If we do not prevail in such a proceeding, our patents could potentially be declared to be invalid, unenforceable or narrowed in scope, or we could otherwise lose valuable intellectual property rights. Similar proceedings involving the intellectual property we exclusively license could also have an impact on our business. Further, if any of our other owned or exclusively licensed patents are declared invalid, unenforceable or narrowed in scope, our competitive position could be adversely affected. We could face claims that our activities or the manufacture, use or sale of our assays infringe the intellectual property rights of others, which could cause us to pay damages or licensing fees and limit our ability to sell some or all of our assays and services. Our research, development and commercialization activities may infringe or be claimed to infringe patents or other intellectual property rights owned by other parties of which we may be unaware because the relevant patent applications may have been filed but not yet published. Certain of our competitors and other companies have substantial patent portfolios, and may attempt to use patent litigation as a means to obtain a competitive advantage or to extract licensing revenue. In addition to patent infringement claims, we may also be subject to other claims relating to the violation of intellectual property rights, such as claims that we have misappropriated trade secrets or infringed third party trademarks. The risks of being involved in such litigation may also increase as we gain greater visibility as a public company and as we gain commercial acceptance of our diagnostic tests and move into new markets and applications for our assays. Regardless of merit or outcome, our involvement in any litigation, interference or other administrative proceedings could cause us to incur substantial expense and could significantly divert the efforts of our technical and management personnel. Any public announcements related to litigation or interference proceedings initiated or threatened against us could cause our share price to decline. An adverse determination, or any actions we take or agreements we enter into in order to resolve or avoid disputes, may subject us to the loss of our proprietary position or to significant liabilities, or require us to seek licenses that may include substantial cost and ongoing royalties. Licenses may not be available from third parties, or may not be obtainable on satisfactory terms. An adverse determination or a failure to obtain necessary licenses may restrict or prevent us from manufacturing and selling our diagnostic tests and offering our services. These outcomes could materially harm our business, financial condition and results of operations. 48 We may not be able to adequately protect our intellectual property outside of the United States. The laws of some foreign countries do not protect intellectual property rights to the same extent as the laws of the United States, and many companies have encountered significant problems in protecting and defending such rights in foreign jurisdictions. The legal systems of certain countries, particularly certain developing countries, do not favor the enforcement of patents and other intellectual property protection, particularly those relating to medical devices, diagnostic testing and biotechnology, which could make it difficult for us to stop the infringement of our patents and for licensors, if they were to seek to do so, to stop infringement of patents that are licensed to us. Proceedings to enforce our patent rights in foreign jurisdictions could result in substantial cost and divert our efforts and attention from other aspects of our business. Additionally, prosecuting and maintaining intellectual property (particularly patent) rights are very costly endeavors, and for these and other reasons we may not pursue or obtain patent protection in all major markets. We do not know whether legal and government fees will increase substantially and therefore are unable to predict whether cost may factor into our global intellectual property strategy. In addition to the risks associated with patent rights, the laws in some foreign jurisdictions may not provide protection for our trade secrets and other intellectual property. If our trade secrets or other intellectual property are misappropriated in foreign jurisdictions, we may be without adequate remedies to address these issues. Additionally, we also rely on confidentiality and assignment of invention agreements to protect our intellectual property in foreign jurisdictions. These agreements may provide for contractual remedies in the event of misappropriation, but we do not know to what extent, if any, these agreements, and any remedies for their breach, will be enforced by a foreign court. If our intellectual property is misappropriated or infringed upon and an adequate remedy is not available, our future prospects will likely diminish. The sale of diagnostic tests that infringe our intellectual property rights, particularly if such diagnostic tests are offered at a lower cost, could negatively impact our ability to achieve commercial success and may materially and adversely harm our business. Our failure to secure trademark registrations could adversely affect our business and our ability to market our assays and product candidates. Our trademark applications in the United States and any other jurisdictions where we may file may not be allowed for registration, and our registered trademarks may not be maintained or enforced. During trademark registration proceedings, we may receive rejections. Although we are given an opportunity to respond to those rejections, we may be unable to overcome such rejections. In addition, in the USPTO and in corresponding foreign agencies, third parties are given an opportunity to oppose pending trademark applications and to seek to cancel registered trademarks. Opposition or cancellation proceedings may be filed against our applications and or registrations, and our applications and or registrations may not survive such proceedings. Failure to secure such trademark registrations in the United States and in foreign jurisdictions could adversely affect our business and our ability to market our diagnostic tests and product candidates. We may be unable to adequately prevent disclosure of trade secrets and other proprietary information, or the misappropriation of the intellectual property we regard as our own. We rely on trade secrets to protect our proprietary know how and technological advances, particularly where we do not believe patent protection is appropriate or obtainable. Nevertheless, trade secrets are difficult to protect. We rely in part on confidentiality agreements with our employees, consultants, third party contractors, third party collaborators and other advisors to protect our trade secrets and other proprietary information. These agreements generally require that the other party to the agreement keep confidential and not disclose to third parties all confidential information developed by us or made known to the other party by us during the course of the other party relationship with us. These agreements may not effectively prevent disclosure of confidential information and may not provide an adequate remedy in the event of unauthorized disclosure of confidential information. Monitoring unauthorized disclosure is difficult, and we do not know whether the steps we have taken to prevent such disclosure are, or will be, adequate. If we were to seek to pursue a claim that a third party had illegally obtained and was using our trade secrets, it would be expensive and time consuming, and the outcome would be 49 unpredictable. Further, courts outside the United States may be less willing to protect trade secrets. In addition, others may independently discover our trade secrets and proprietary information and therefore be free to use such trade secrets and proprietary information. Costly and time consuming litigation could be necessary to enforce and determine the scope of our proprietary rights. In addition, our trade secrets and proprietary information may be misappropriated as a result of breaches of our electronic or physical security systems in which case we may have no legal recourse. Failure to obtain, or maintain, trade secret protection could enable competitors to use our proprietary information to develop assays that compete with our assays or cause additional, material adverse effects upon our competitive business position. We may be subject to claims that our employees have wrongfully used or disclosed alleged trade secrets of their former employers. As is common in our industry, we employ individuals who were previously employed at other companies in our industry or in related industries, including our competitors or potential competitors. We may be subject to claims that we or these employees have inadvertently or otherwise used or disclosed trade secrets or other proprietary information of their former employers. Litigation may be necessary to defend against these claims. Even if we are successful in defending against these claims, litigation could result in substantial costs and be a distraction to management. ITEM 1B. UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS. N1 ITEM 2 PROPERTIES.
